Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2701.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Sections 5422, 5423, 5424, 5425, 5427, 5428, 5429 and 5431 of Title 20 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526272829 are amended to read:§ 5422. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Advance health care directive." A health care power of attorney, [living will or a written] health care instruction or combination of a health care power of attorney and [living will.] health care instruction. The term includes an advance mental health care directive."Advance mental health care directive." A power of attorney for health care, health care instruction, or both, created under section 5451.1 (relating to advance mental health care directive).["Attending physician." The physician who has primary responsibility for the health care of a principal or patient.]"Bracelet." An out-of-hospital do-not-resuscitate bracelet as defined under section 5483 (relating to definitions)."Capacity." Having capacity under section 5448.3 (relating to capacity)."Cardiopulmonary resuscitation." Any of the following procedures:(1) Cardiac compression.(2) Invasive airway technique.(3) Artificial ventilation.(4) Defibrillation.(5) Any other procedure related to those set forth in paragraphs (1) through (4)."Cohabitant." Each of two individuals who have been living together as a couple for at least one year after each became an 20260HB2701PN3772 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 adult or was emancipated and who are not married to each other.["Competent." A condition in which an individual, when provided appropriate medical information, communication supports and technical assistance, is documented by a health care provider to do all of the following:(1) Understand the potential material benefits, risks and alternatives involved in a specific proposed health care decision.(2) Make that health care decision on his own behalf.(3) Communicate that health care decision to any other person.This term is intended to permit individuals to be found competent to make some health care decisions, but incompetent to make others.]" Default surrogate. " An individual authorized under section 5461 (relating to decisions by default surrogate) to make a health care decision for another individual."DNR." Do not resuscitate."Domestic partner or life partner." The partner of an individual in a domestic partnership or life partnership that is recognized by a municipality of this Commonwealth."Emergency medical services provider." As defined under section 5483 [(relating to definitions)]."End-stage medical condition." An incurable and irreversible medical condition in an advanced state caused by injury, disease or physical illness that will, in the opinion of [the attending physician] an individual's responsible health care professional to a reasonable degree of medical certainty, result in death, despite the introduction or continuation of medical treatment. Except as specifically set forth in an advance health care 20260HB2701PN3772 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 directive, the term is not intended to preclude treatment of a disease, illness or physical, mental, cognitive or intellectual condition, even if incurable and irreversible and regardless of severity, if both of the following apply:(1) The [patient] individual with the condition would benefit from the medical treatment, including palliative care.(2) Such treatment would not merely prolong the process of dying."Family member." A spouse, domestic partner, life partner, adult child, parent or grandparent, or an adult descendant of a spouse, domestic partner, life partner, child, parent or grandparent."Guardian." A person appointed under law by a court to make decisions regarding the person of an individual, including a person appointed under Chapter 55 (relating to incapacitated persons) as the guardian of the person of an individual. The term does not include a guardian ad litem."Health care." [Any care, treatment, service or procedure to maintain, diagnose, treat or provide for physical or mental health, custodial or personal care, including any medication program, therapeutical and surgical procedure and life-sustaining treatment.] Care or treatment or a service or procedure to maintain, monitor, diagnose or otherwise affect an individual's physical or mental illness, injury or condition. The term includes mental health care."Health care agent." An individual [designated by a principal in an advance health care directive.] appointed under a power of attorney for health care to make a health care decision for the individual who made the appointment. The term 20260HB2701PN3772 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 includes a co-agent or alternate agent appointed under section 5455 (relating to appointment of health care agents)."Health care decision." A decision by an individual or the individual's surrogate regarding [an] the individual's health care, including, but not limited to, the following:(1) Selection [and] or discharge of a health care [provider] professional or health care institution.(2) Approval or disapproval of a diagnostic test, surgical procedure [or], program of medication, therapeutic intervention or other health care.(3) Directions to initiate, continue, withhold or withdraw all forms of life-sustaining treatment, including instructions not to resuscitate.(4) Admission to a medical, nursing, residential or similar facility, or entering into agreements for the individual's care.(5) Making anatomical gifts, or after the death of the individual, disposing of the remains or consenting to autopsies."Health care institution." A facility or agency licensed, certified or otherwise authorized or permitted by other law to provide health care in this Commonwealth in the ordinary course of business. The term includes a health care facility as defined in the act of July 19, 1979 (P.L.130, No.48), known as the Health Care Facilities Act."Health care instruction." A direction, whether or not in a record, made by an individual that indicates the individual's goals, preferences or wishes concerning the provision, withholding or withdrawal of health care. The term includes a direction intended to be effective if a specified condition 20260HB2701PN3772 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 arises."Health care power of [attorney." A writing made by a principal designating an individual] attorney" or "power of attorney for health care." A record in which an individual appoints a health care agent to make health care decisions for the principal."Health care [provider." A person] professional." An individual who is licensed, certified or otherwise authorized by the laws of this Commonwealth to administer or provide health care in the ordinary course of business or practice of a profession. The term includes personnel recognized under the act of July 3, 1985 (P.L.164, No.45), known as the Emergency Medical Services Act.["Health care representative." An individual authorized under section 5461 (relating to decisions by health care representative) to make health care decisions for a principal."Incompetent." A condition in which an individual, despite being provided appropriate medical information, communication supports and technical assistance, is documented by a health care provider to be:(1) unable to understand the potential material benefits, risks and alternatives involved in a specific proposed health care decision;(2) unable to make that health care decision on his own behalf; or(3) unable to communicate that health care decision to any other person.The term is intended to permit individuals to be found incompetent to make some health care decisions, but competent to make others.]20260HB2701PN3772 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Individual." An adult or emancipated minor."Invasive airway technique." Any advanced airway technique, including endotracheal intubation."Life-sustaining treatment." Any medical procedure or intervention that, when administered to [a patient or principal] an individual who has an end-stage medical condition or is permanently unconscious, will serve only to prolong the process of dying or maintain the individual in a state of permanent unconsciousness. In the case of an individual with an advance health care directive or order, the term includes nutrition and hydration administered by gastric tube or intravenously or any other artificial or invasive means if the advance health care directive or order so specifically provides.["Living will." A writing made in accordance with this chapter that expresses a principal's wishes and instructions for health care and health care directions when the principal is determined to be incompetent and has an end-stage medical condition or is permanently unconscious.]"Long-term care facility." As defined in the Health Care Facilities Act."Medical command physician." A licensed physician who is authorized to give a medical command under the act of July 3, 1985 (P.L.164, No.45), known as the Emergency Medical Services Act."Mental health care." Care, treatment, service or procedure to maintain, monitor, diagnose, treat or otherwise affect an individual's mental illness or other psychiatric, psychological or psychosocial condition."Necklace." An out-of-hospital do-not-resuscitate necklace as defined under section 5483 [(relating to definitions)].20260HB2701PN3772 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Order." An out-of-hospital do-not-resuscitate order as defined under section 5483 [(relating to definitions)]."Patient." An out-of-hospital do-not-resuscitate patient as defined under section 5483 [(relating to definitions)]."Permanently unconscious." A medical condition that has been diagnosed in accordance with currently accepted medical standards and with reasonable medical certainty as total and irreversible loss of consciousness and capacity for interaction with the environment. The term includes, without limitation, an irreversible vegetative state or irreversible coma."Person." Any individual, estate, corporation, partnership, association or other similar entity, or any Federal, State or local government or governmental agency or instrumentality or other legal entity."Person interested in the welfare of the individual." Any of the following:(1) the individual's surrogate;(2) a family member of the individual;(3) the cohabitant of the individual;(4) a public entity providing health care case management or protective services to the individual;(5) a person appointed under other law to make decisions for the individual under a power of attorney for finances; or (6) a person that has an ongoing personal or professional relationship with the individual, including a person that has provided educational or health care services or supported decision making to the individual."Physician." An individual authorized to practice medicine under either the act of December 20, 1985 (P.L.457, No.112), known as the Medical Practice Act of 1985, or the act of October 20260HB2701PN3772 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 5, 1978 (P.L.1109, No.261), known as the Osteopathic Medical Practice Act.["Principal." An individual who executes an advance health care directive, designates an individual to act or disqualifies an individual from acting as a health care representative or an individual for whom a health care representative acts in accordance with this chapter.]"Reasonably available." Readily able to be contacted without undue effort and willing and able to act in a timely manner considering the urgency of [the] an individual's health care needs. When used to refer to a health care agent or default surrogate, the term includes being willing and able to comply with the duties under section 5456 (relating to duties and authority of health care agent) in a timely manner considering the urgency of the individual's health care situation."Record." Information that is inscribed on a tangible medium or that is stored in an electronic or other medium and is retrievable in perceivable form."Responsible health care professional." Either of the following:(1) a health care professional designated by an individual or the individual's surrogate to have primary responsibility for the individual's health care or for overseeing a course of treatment; or(2) in the absence of a designation under paragraph (1) or, if the professional designated under paragraph (1) is not reasonably available, a health care professional who has primary responsibility for overseeing the individual's health care or for overseeing a course of treatment."Sign." Includes any mark with present intent to 20260HB2701PN3772 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 authenticate or adopt a record:(1) execute or adopt a tangible symbol; or(2) attach to or logically associate with the record an electronic symbol, sound or process."State." A state of the United States, the District of Columbia, Puerto Rico, the United States Virgin Islands or any other territory or possession subject to the jurisdiction of the United States. The term includes a federally recognized Indian tribe."Supported decision making." Assistance, from one or more persons of an individual's choosing, that helps the individual make or communicate a decision, including by helping the individual understand the nature and consequences of the decision."Surrogate." Any of the following:(1) a health care agent;(2) a default surrogate; or(3) a guardian authorized to make health care decisions.§ 5423. Legislative findings and intent.(a) Intent.--This chapter provides a statutory means for [competent adults] individuals with capacity to control their health care through instructions [written] made in advance or by health care agents or [health care representatives] default surrogates and requested orders. Nothing in this chapter is intended to:(1) affect or supersede the holdings of In re Fiori 543 Pa. 592, 673 A.2d 905 (1996);(2) condone, authorize or approve mercy killing, euthanasia or aided suicide; [or](3) permit any affirmative or deliberate act or omission 20260HB2701PN3772 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 to end life other than as defined in this chapter[.]; or(4) affect other law of this Commonwealth governing treatment for mental illness of an individual involuntarily committed to a facility, including under the act of July 9, 1976 (P.L.817, No.143), known as the Mental Health Procedures Act.(b) Presumption not created.--This chapter does not create any presumption regarding the intent of an individual who has not executed an advance health care directive [to consent to the use or withholding of life-sustaining treatment in the event of an end-stage medical condition or in the event the individual is permanently unconscious].(c) Findings in general.--The General Assembly finds that:(1) Individuals have a qualified right to make decisions relating to their own health care.(2) This right is subject to certain interests of society, such as the maintenance of ethical standards in the medical profession and the preservation and protection of human life.(3) Modern medical technological procedures make possible the prolongation of human life beyond natural limits.(4) The application of some procedures to an individual suffering a difficult and uncomfortable process of dying may cause loss of dignity and secure only continuation of a precarious and burdensome prolongation of life.(5) It is in the best interest of individuals under the care of health care [providers] professionals if health care [providers] professionals initiate discussions with them regarding [living wills and health care powers of attorney] 20260HB2701PN3772 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 advance health care directives during initial consultations, annual examinations, at diagnosis of a chronic illness or when an individual under their care transfers from one health care setting to another so that the individuals under their care may make known their wishes to receive, continue, discontinue or refuse medical treatment in the event that they are [diagnosed with an end-stage medical condition or become permanently unconscious.] no longer able to make medical decisions for themselves.(6) Health care [providers] professionals should initiate such discussions[, including discussion of out-of-hospital do-not-resuscitate orders,] with individuals under their care at the time of determination of an end-stage medical condition and should document such discussion in the individual's medical record.§ 5424. [Compliance] Refusal to comply.(a) Notification by [attending physician] responsible health care professional or health care [provider] institution.--[If an attending physician or other health care provider cannot in good conscience comply with a living will or health care decision of a health care agent or health care representative or if the policies of a health care provider preclude compliance with a living will or health care decision of a health care agent or health care representative, the attending physician or health care provider shall so inform the principal if the principal is competent or the principal's health care agent or health care representative if the principal is incompetent.] A health care professional or health care institution may refuse to provide health care consistent with a health care instruction or health care decision if:20260HB2701PN3772 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) the instruction or decision is contrary to a policy of the health care institution providing care to the individual that is based expressly on reasons of conscience and the policy was timely communicated to the individual or to the individual ' s surrogate; (2) the care would require health care that is not available to the professional or institution; or(3) compliance with the instruction or decision would:(i) require the professional to provide care that is contrary to the professional ' s religious belief or moral conviction if other law permits the professional to refuse to provide care for that reason;(ii) require the professional or institution to provide care that is contrary to generally accepted health care standards applicable to the professional or institution; or(iii) violate a court order or other law.(b) Transfer.--[The attending physician or health care provider under subsection (a) shall make every reasonable effort to assist in the transfer of the principal to another physician or health care provider who will comply with the living will or health care decision of the health care agent or health care representative.] A health care professional or health care institution that refuses to provide care under subsection (a) shall:(1) as soon as reasonably feasible, inform the individual, if possible, and the individual ' s surrogate of the refusal;(2) immediately make a reasonable effort to transfer the individual to another health care professional or health care 20260HB2701PN3772 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 institution that is willing to comply with the instruction or decision; and(3) either:(i) if care is refused under subsection (a)(1) or (2), provide life-sustaining care and care needed to keep or make the individual comfortable, consistent with accepted medical standards to the extent feasible, until a transfer is made; or(ii) if care is refused under subsection (a)(3), provide life-sustaining care and care needed to keep or make the individual comfortable, consistent with accepted medical standards, until a transfer is made or, if the professional or institution reasonably believes that a transfer cannot be made, for at least 10 days after the refusal.(c) Employee or staff member of health care [provider] institution.--(1) An employee or a staff member of a health care [provider] institution may not be required to participate in the withholding or withdrawal of life-sustaining treatment.(2) A health care [provider] institution that is an employer may not discharge or in any other manner discriminate against [its] an employee or staff member as a result of informing the employer of the employee's choice not to participate in the withholding or withdrawal of life-sustaining treatment.(3) A health care [provider] institution that is an employer may require [its] an employee or staff member to express in [writing] a record the wishes or unwillingness of the employee or staff member as set forth in this subsection.20260HB2701PN3772 - 14 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (d) Liability.--If transfer under subsection (b) is impossible, the provision of life-sustaining treatment to [a principal may not subject an attending physician] the individual may not subject a responsible health care professional or a health care [provider] institution to criminal or civil liability or administrative sanction for failure to carry out either the provisions of [a living will] an advance health care directive or a health care decision of a health care agent or [health care representative] default surrogate.§ 5425. Conflicting advance health care directives.(a) Conflicting directives.--If a provision of an advance health care directive conflicts with a provision of another advance health care directive, the provision of the instrument latest in date of execution shall prevail to the extent of the conflict unless the instruments expressly provide otherwise.(b) Conflict between mental health care and other directives.--If a direction in an advance mental health care directive of an individual conflicts with a direction in another advance health care directive of the individual, the later direction revokes the earlier direction to the extent of the conflict.(c) Advance health care directive not revoked.--An appointment of a health care agent to make decisions only for mental health care for an individual does not revoke an earlier appointment of a health care agent to make other health care decisions for the individual. A later appointment revokes the authority of a health care agent under the earlier appointment to make decisions about mental health care unless otherwise specified in the power of attorney making the later appointment.(d) Advance mental health care directive not revoked.--An 20260HB2701PN3772 - 15 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 appointment of a health care agent to make health care decisions for an individual other than decisions about mental health care made after appointment of a health care agent authorized to make only mental health care decisions does not revoke the appointment of a health care agent authorized to make only mental health care decisions.§ 5427. Life insurance.The making of or failure to make an advance health care directive, to request an order or to designate or disqualify a [health care representative] health care agent or default surrogate in accordance with this chapter shall not affect in any manner the sale, procurement or issuance of a policy of life insurance, nor shall it be deemed to modify the terms of an existing policy of life insurance. No policy of life insurance shall be legally impaired or invalidated in any manner by the withholding or withdrawal of life-sustaining treatment from an insured individual, notwithstanding a term of the policy to the contrary.§ 5428. Health care instruments optional.A health care [provider] institution, a health care service plan, a health maintenance organization, an insurer issuing disability insurance, a self-insured employee welfare benefit plan, a nonprofit hospital plan and a Federal, State or local government sponsored or operated program may not:(1) Require an individual to execute an advance health care directive or order or to designate or disqualify a [health care representative] health care agent or default surrogate as a condition for being insured for or receiving health care services.(2) Charge an individual a different rate or fee whether 20260HB2701PN3772 - 16 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 or not the individual executes or has executed an advance health care directive or order or designated or disqualified a [health care representative] health care agent or default surrogate.§ 5429. Pregnancy.(a) [Living wills] Health care instruction and health care decisions.--Notwithstanding the existence of a [living will] health care instruction, a health care decision by a [health care representative] default surrogate or health care agent or any other direction to the contrary, life-sustaining treatment, nutrition and hydration shall be provided to a pregnant woman who [is incompetent] lacks capacity and has an end-stage medical condition or who is permanently unconscious unless, to a reasonable degree of medical certainty as certified on the pregnant woman's medical record by the pregnant woman's [attending physician] responsible health care professional and an obstetrician who has examined the pregnant woman, life-sustaining treatment, nutrition and hydration:(1) will not maintain the pregnant woman in such a way as to permit the continuing development and live birth of the unborn child;(2) will be physically harmful to the pregnant woman; or(3) will cause pain to the pregnant woman that cannot be alleviated by medication.(b) Rule for orders.--Notwithstanding the existence of an order or direction to the contrary, life-sustaining treatment, cardiopulmonary resuscitation, nutrition and hydration shall be provided to a pregnant patient unless, to a reasonable degree of medical certainty as certified on the pregnant patient's medical record by the [attending physician] responsible health care 20260HB2701PN3772 - 17 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 professional and an obstetrician who has examined the pregnant patient, life-sustaining treatment, nutrition and hydration:(1) will not maintain the pregnant patient in such a way as to permit the continuing development and live birth of the unborn child;(2) will be physically harmful to the pregnant patient; or(3) would cause pain to the pregnant patient that cannot be alleviated by medication.(c) Pregnancy test.--Nothing in this chapter shall require a physician to perform a pregnancy test unless the physician has reason to believe that the woman may be pregnant.(d) Payment of expenses by Commonwealth.--(1) In the event that treatment, cardiopulmonary resuscitation, nutrition and hydration are provided to a pregnant woman, notwithstanding the existence of a [living will] health care instruction, health care decision by a [health care representative] default surrogate or health care agent, order or direction to the contrary, the Commonwealth shall pay all usual, customary and reasonable expenses directly, indirectly and actually incurred by the pregnant woman to whom such treatment, cardiopulmonary resuscitation, nutrition and hydration are provided.(2) The Commonwealth shall have the right of subrogation against all moneys paid by any third-party health insurer on behalf of the pregnant woman.(3) The expenditures incurred on behalf of the pregnant woman constitute a grant, and a lien may not be placed upon the property of the pregnant woman, her estate or her heirs.§ 5431. Liability.20260HB2701PN3772 - 18 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (a) General rule.--A health care [provider or another person] institution or health care professional may not be subject to criminal or civil liability, discipline for unprofessional conduct or administrative sanctions and may not be found to have committed an act of unprofessional conduct as a result of any of the following:(1) Causing or participating in the initiating, continuing, withholding or withdrawal of life-sustaining treatment or cardiopulmonary resuscitation from [a patient or principal] an individual, if the health care [provider] institution or health care professional believes in good faith that [he] the health care institution or health care professional has followed the [patient's or principal's] individual's wishes as expressed in [a living will, order] an advance health care directive or revocation made under this chapter.(2) Complying with a direction or decision of an individual who the health care [provider] institution or health care professional believes in good faith has authority to act as [a principal's] an individual's health care agent or [health care representative] default surrogate so long as the direction or decision is not clearly contrary to the terms of an advance health care directive that has been delivered to the [provider] institution or professional.(3) Refusing to comply with a direction or decision of an individual based on a good faith belief that the individual lacks authority to act as [a principal's] another individual's health care agent or [health care representative] default surrogate or is not acting in accordance with section 5456(c) (relating to duties and 20260HB2701PN3772 - 19 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 authority of health care agent) or 5461(c) (relating to decisions by [health care representative] default surrogate).(4) Complying with an advance health care directive under the assumption that it was valid when made and the health care [provider] institution or health care professional believes in good faith that it has not been amended or revoked.(5) Disclosing health care information to another person based upon a good faith belief that the disclosure is authorized, permitted or required by this chapter.(6) Refusing to comply with a direction or decision of an individual based on a good faith belief that compliance with the direction or decision would be unethical or, to a reasonable degree of medical certainty, would result in medical care having no medical basis in addressing any medical need or condition of the individual, provided that the health care [provider] institution or health care professional complies in good faith with sections 5424 (relating to [compliance] refusal to comply) and 5462(c) (relating to duties of [attending physician] responsible health care professional and health care [provider] institution).(7) Refusing to comply with an advance health care directive based on a reasonable belief that the directive is not valid, including a reasonable belief that the directive was not made by the individual or, after its creation, was substantively altered by a person other than the individual who created it.(8) Determining that an individual who otherwise might be authorized to act as a health care agent or default 20260HB2701PN3772 - 20 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 surrogate is not reasonably available.(9) Complying with an individual's direction under section 5451.1(d) (relating to advance mental health care directive).(b) Same effect as if dealing with [principal.--Any health care provider and other] individual.--A person acting under subsection (a) is protected and released to the same extent as if dealing directly with [a competent principal] an individual who has capacity.(c) Health care agent.--No health care agent or default surrogate acting according to the terms of [a health care power of attorney] an advance health care directive shall be subject to civil or criminal liability for acting in good faith for [a principal] the individual who created the directive or failing in good faith to act for [a principal] the individual.[(d) Health care representative.--No health care representative who in good faith acts or fails in good faith to act for the principal shall be subject to civil or criminal liability for the action or failure to act.]Section 2. Title 20 is amended by adding sections to read:§ 5433.1. Prohibited conduct; damages.(a) Prohibitions.--A person may not:(1) intentionally falsify, in whole or in part, an advance health care directive;(2) for the purpose of frustrating the intent of the individual who created an advance health care directive or with knowledge that doing so is likely to frustrate the intent:(i) intentionally conceal, deface, obliterate or delete the directive or a revocation of the directive 20260HB2701PN3772 - 21 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 without consent of the individual who created or revoked the directive; or(ii) intentionally withhold knowledge of the existence or revocation of the directive from a responsible health care professional or health care institution providing health care to the individual who created or revoked the directive;(3) coerce or fraudulently induce an individual to create, revoke or refrain from creating or revoking an advance health care directive or a part of a directive; or(4) require or prohibit the creation or revocation of an advance health care directive as a condition for providing health care.(b) Cause of action generally.--An individual who is the subject of conduct prohibited under subsection (a), or the individual's estate, has a cause of action against a person that violates subsection (a) for statutory damages of $25,000 or actual damages resulting from the violation, whichever is greater.(c) Cause of action for intentional violations.--Subject to subsection (d), an individual who makes a health care instruction, or the individual's estate, has a cause of action against a health care professional or health care institution that intentionally violates section 5462(b), (d) or (e) (relating to duties of attending physician and health care provider) for statutory damages of $50,000 or actual damages resulting from the violation, whichever is greater.(d) Emergency services excepted.--A health care professional who is an emergency medical services provider is not liable under subsection (c) for a violation of section 5462(d) if:20260HB2701PN3772 - 22 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) the violation occurs in the course of providing care to an individual experiencing a health condition for which the professional reasonably believes the care was appropriate to avoid imminent loss of life or serious harm to the individual;(2) the failure to comply is consistent with accepted standards of the profession of the professional; and(3) the provision of care does not begin in a health care institution in which the individual resides or was receiving care.(e) Fees and costs.--In an action under this section, a prevailing plaintiff may recover reasonable attorney's fees, court costs and other reasonable litigation expenses.(f) Other actions.--A cause of action or remedy under this section is in addition to any cause of action or remedy under other law.§ 5433.2. Judicial relief.(a) Petition.--On petition of an individual, the individual's surrogate, a health care professional or health care institution providing health care to the individual or a person interested in the welfare of the individual, the court may:(1) enjoin implementation of a health care decision made by a health care agent or default surrogate on behalf of the individual, on a finding that the decision is inconsistent with section 5456 (relating to duties and authority of health care agent);(2) enjoin a health care agent from making a health care decision for the individual, on a finding that the individual's appointment of the agent has been revoked or the 20260HB2701PN3772 - 23 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 agent:(i) is disqualified under section 5455(b) (relating to appointment of health care agents);(ii) is unwilling or unable to comply with section 5456; or(iii) poses a danger to the individual's well-being;(3) enjoin another individual from acting as a default surrogate, on a finding that the other individual acting as a default surrogate did not comply with section 5461 (relating to decisions by default surrogate) or the other individual:(i) is disqualified under section 5461(e);(ii) is unwilling or unable to comply with section 5456; or(iii) poses a danger to the first individual's well-being; or(4) order implementation of a health care decision made:(i) by and for the individual; or(ii) by a health care agent or default surrogate who is acting in compliance with the powers and duties of the agent or default surrogate.(b) No danger.--For the purposes of this chapter, advocacy for the withholding or withdrawal of health care or mental health care from an individual is not itself evidence that an agent or default surrogate, or a potential agent or default surrogate, poses a danger to the individual's well-being.(c) Expedited proceedings.--A proceeding under this section is governed by the Rules of Civil Procedure governing expedited proceedings and proceedings affecting persons found or alleged to lack capacity.§ 5435. Implementation; savings provision; transitional 20260HB2701PN3772 - 24 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 provision.(a) Implementation.--An advance health care directive created before, on or after the effective date of this subsection must be interpreted in accordance with the laws of this Commonwealth, excluding the Commonwealth's choice-of-law rules, at the time the directive is implemented.(b) Created prior.--An advance health care directive created before the effective date of this subsection is valid if it complies with this chapter or complied at the time of creation with the law of the state in which it was created.(c) Validity not affected.--This chapter does not affect the validity or effect of an act done before the effective date of this subsection.(d) Existing surrogate.--An individual who assumed authority to act as default surrogate before the effective date of this subsection may continue to act as default surrogate until the individual for whom the default surrogate is acting has capacity or the default surrogate is disqualified, whichever occurs first.(e) Transitional provision.--This chapter applies to an advance health care directive created before, on or after the effective date of this subsection.§ 5436. Uniformity of application and construction.In applying and construing this chapter, consideration shall be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to the subject matter among states that enact it.Section 3. Subchapter B of Chapter 54 of Title 20 is repealed:[SUBCHAPTER BLIVING WILLS20260HB2701PN3772 - 25 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 § 5441. Short title of subchapter.This subchapter shall be known and may be cited as the Living Will Act.§ 5442. Execution.(a) Who may make.--An individual of sound mind may make a living will governing the initiation, continuation, withholding or withdrawal of life-sustaining treatment if the individual:(1) is 18 years of age or older;(2) has graduated from high school;(3) has married; or(4) is an emancipated minor.(b) Requirements.--A living will shall be:(1) dated and signed by the principal by signature or mark or by another individual on behalf of and at the direction of the principal if the principal is unable to sign but specifically directs another individual to sign the living will; and(2) witnessed by two individuals, each of whom is 18 years of age or older.(c) Witnesses.--(1) An individual who signs a living will on behalf of and at the direction of a principal may not witness the living will.(2) A health care provider and its agent may not sign a living will on behalf of and at the direction of a principal if the health care provider or agent provides health care services to the principal.§ 5443. When living will operative.(a) When operative.--A living will becomes operative when:(1) a copy is provided to the attending physician; and20260HB2701PN3772 - 26 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) the principal is determined by the attending physician to be incompetent and to have an end-stage medical condition or to be permanently unconscious.(b) Compliance.--When a living will becomes operative, the attending physician and other health care providers shall act in accordance with its provisions or comply with the transfer provisions of section 5424 (relating to compliance).(c) Invalidity of specific direction.--If a specific direction in a living will is held to be invalid, the invalidity does not negate other directions in the living will that can be effected without the invalid direction.(d) Medical record.--Any health care provider to whom a copy of a living will is furnished shall make it a part of the medical record of the principal and, if unwilling to comply with the living will, promptly so advise the principal or the principal's health care agent or representative.(e) Duration.--Unless a living will states a time of termination, it is valid until revoked by the principal, notwithstanding the lapse of time since its execution.(f) Absence of living will.--If an individual does not make a living will, a presumption does not arise regarding the intent of the individual to consent to or to refuse the initiation, continuation, withholding or withdrawal of life-sustaining treatment.(g) Duty of physician to certify end-stage medical condition.--Promptly after a determination that the principal has an end-stage medical condition or is permanently unconscious, the attending physician shall certify in writing that the principal has an end-stage medical condition or is permanently unconscious.20260HB2701PN3772 - 27 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 § 5444. Revocation.(a) When living will may be revoked.--A living will may be revoked at any time and in any manner by the principal regardless of the mental or physical condition of the principal.(b) Effect of revocation.--A revocation is effective upon communication to the attending physician or other health care provider by the principal or a witness to the revocation.(c) Medical record.--The attending physician or other health care provider shall make the revocation part of the medical record of the principal.§ 5445. Emergency medical services.(a) General rule.--An emergency medical services provider shall, in the course of providing care to a principal, at all times comply with the instructions of an authorized medical command physician to withhold or discontinue cardiopulmonary resuscitation for a principal whose living will has become operative under section 5443(a) (relating to when living will operative).(b) Applicability.--This section is applicable only in those instances where an out-of-hospital DNR order is not in effect under section 5484 (relating to orders, bracelets and necklaces).§ 5446. Validity.(a) Living will executed prior to effective date of subchapter.--This subchapter does not limit the validity of a living will executed prior to the effective date of this subchapter.(b) Living will executed in another state or jurisdiction.--A living will executed in another state or jurisdiction and in conformity with the laws of that state or jurisdiction shall be 20260HB2701PN3772 - 28 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 considered valid in this Commonwealth, except to the extent that the living will executed in another state or jurisdiction would allow a principal to direct procedures inconsistent with the laws of this Commonwealth.§ 5447. Form.A living will may be in any written form expressing the wishes of a principal regarding the initiation, continuation, withholding or withdrawal of life-sustaining treatment and may include other specific directions, including, but not limited to, designation of a health care agent to make health care decisions for the principal if the principal is determined to be incompetent and to have an end-stage medical condition or is permanently unconscious. An example of a living will appears in the combined form set forth in Subchapter D (relating to combined form).]Section 4. Chapter 54 of Title 20 is amended by adding a subchapter to read:SUBCHAPTER C.1HEALTH CARE DECISIONS ANDADVANCE HEALTH CARE DIRECTIVESSec.5448.1. (Reserved).5448.2. (Reserved).5448.3. Capacity.5448.4. Presumption of capacity; overcoming presumption.5448.5. Notice of finding of lack of capacity; right to object.5448.6. Judicial review of finding of lack of capacity.5448.7. Health care instruction.§ 5448.1. (Reserved).§ 5448.2. (Reserved).20260HB2701PN3772 - 29 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 § 5448.3. Capacity.(a) Capacity.--An individual has capacity for the purpose of this subchapter if the individual:(1) is willing and able to communicate a decision independently or with appropriate services, technological assistance, supported decision making or other reasonable accommodation; and(2) in making or revoking:(i) a health care decision, understands the nature and consequences of the decision, including the primary risks and benefits of the decision;(ii) a health care instruction, understands the nature and consequences of the instruction, including the primary risks and benefits of the choices expressed in the instruction; and(iii) an appointment of a health care agent under a health care power of attorney or identification of a default surrogate under section 5461(d)(1.1)(i) (relating to decisions by default surrogate), recognizes the identity of the individual being appointed or identified and understands the general nature of the relationship of the individual making the appointment or identification with the individual being appointed or identified.(b) Rights.--The right of an individual who has capacity to make a decision about the individual ' s health care is not affected by whether the individual creates or revokes an advance health care directive.§ 5448.4. Presumption of capacity; overcoming presumption.(a) Presumption of capacity.--An individual is presumed to have capacity to make or revoke a health care decision, health 20260HB2701PN3772 - 30 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 care instruction and power of attorney for health care unless:(1) a court has found the individual lacks capacity to do so; or(2) the presumption is rebutted under subsection (b).(b) Overcoming presumption.--Subject to sections 5448.5 (relating to notice of finding of lack of capacity; right to object) and 5448.6 (relating to judicial review of finding of lack of capacity), a presumption under subsection (a) may be rebutted by a finding that the individual lacks capacity:(1) subject to subsection (c), made on the basis of a contemporaneous examination by any of the following:(i) a physician;(ii) a psychologist licensed or otherwise authorized to practice in this Commonwealth;(iii) an individual with training and expertise in the finding of lack of capacity who is licensed or otherwise authorized to practice in this Commonwealth as:(A) a physician assistant;(B) a certified registered nurse practitioner; or(C) a social worker; or(iv) a responsible health care professional not described in subparagraph (i), (ii) or (iii) if:(A) the individual about whom the finding is to be made is experiencing a health condition requiring a decision regarding health care treatment to be made promptly to avoid loss of life or serious harm to the health of the individual; and(B) an individual listed in subparagraph (i), (ii) or (iii) is not reasonably available;20260HB2701PN3772 - 31 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) made in accordance with accepted standards of the profession and the scope of practice of the individual making the finding and to a reasonable degree of certainty; and(3) documented in a record signed by the individual making the finding that includes an opinion of the cause, nature, extent and probable duration of the lack of capacity.(c) Prohibition.--The finding under subsection (b) may not be made by:(1) a family member of the individual presumed to have capacity;(2) the cohabitant of the individual or a descendant of the cohabitant; or(3) the individual ' s surrogate, a family member of the surrogate or a descendant of the surrogate.(d) Presumption.--If the finding under subsection (b) was based on a condition the individual no longer has or a responsible health care professional subsequently has good cause to believe the individual has capacity, the individual is presumed to have capacity unless a court finds the individual lacks capacity or the presumption is rebutted under subsection (b).§ 5448.5. Notice of finding of lack of capacity; right to object.(a) Notification.--As soon as reasonably feasible, an individual who makes a finding under section 5448.4(b) (relating to presumption of capacity; overcoming presumption) shall inform the individual about whom the finding was made or the individual's responsible health care professional of the finding.(b) Notification by health care professional.--As soon as 20260HB2701PN3772 - 32 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 reasonably feasible, a responsible health care professional who is informed of a finding under section 5448.4(b) shall inform the individual about whom the finding was made and the individual's surrogate.(c) Objection to determination.--An individual found under section 5448.4(b) to lack capacity may object to the finding:(1) by orally informing a responsible health care professional;(2) in a record provided to a responsible health care professional or the health care institution in which the individual resides or is receiving care; or(3) by another act that clearly indicates the individual's objection.(d) Effect of objection.--If the individual objects under subsection (c), the finding under section 5448.4(b) is not sufficient to rebut a presumption of capacity in section 5448.4(a) and the individual must be treated as having capacity unless:(1) the individual withdraws the objection;(2) a court finds the individual lacks the presumed capacity;(3) the individual is experiencing a health condition requiring a decision regarding health care treatment to be made promptly to avoid imminent loss of life or serious harm to the health of the individual; or(4) subject to subsection (e), the finding is confirmed by a second finding made by an individual authorized under section 5448.4(b)(1) who:(i) did not make the first finding;(ii) is not a family member of the individual who 20260HB2701PN3772 - 33 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 made the first finding; and(iii) is not the cohabitant of the individual who made the first finding or a descendant of the cohabitant. (e) Second finding.--A second finding that the individual lacks capacity under subsection (d)(4) is not sufficient to rebut the presumption of capacity if the individual is requesting the provision or continuation of life-sustaining treatment and the finding is being used to make a decision to withhold or withdraw the treatment.(f) Duties of health care professional.--As soon as reasonably feasible, a health care professional who is informed of an objection under subsection (c) shall:(1) communicate the objection to a responsible health care professional; and(2) document the objection and the date of the objection in the individual's medical record or communicate the objection and the date of the objection to an administrator with responsibility for medical records of the health care institution providing health care to the individual, who shall document the objection and the date of the objection in the individual's medical record.§ 5448.6. Judicial review of finding of lack of capacity.(a) Petition.--An individual found under section 5448.4(b) (relating to presumption of capacity; overcoming presumption) to lack capacity, a responsible health care professional, the health care institution providing health care to the individual or a person interested in the welfare of the individual may petition the court in the county in which the individual resides or is located to determine whether the individual lacks capacity.20260HB2701PN3772 - 34 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (b) Appointment of legal counsel.--The court in which a petition under subsection (a) is filed shall appoint legal counsel to represent the individual if the individual does not have legal counsel. The court shall hear the petition as soon as possible, but no later than seven days after the petition is filed. As soon as possible, but no later than seven days after the hearing, the court shall determine whether the individual lacks capacity. The court may determine the individual lacks capacity only if the court finds by clear and convincing evidence that the individual lacks capacity.§ 5448.7. Health care instruction.(a) Authorization.--An individual may create a health care instruction that expresses the individual's preferences for future health care, including preferences regarding:(1) health care professionals or health care institutions;(2) how a health care decision will be made and communicated;(3) persons that should or should not be consulted regarding a health care decision;(4) a person to serve as guardian for the individual if one is appointed; and(5) an individual to serve as a default surrogate.(b) Duty to document instructions.--A health care professional to whom an individual communicates or provides an instruction under subsection (a) shall document the instruction and the date of the instruction in the individual's medical record or communicate the instruction and date of the instruction to an administrator with responsibility for medical records of the health care institution providing health care to 20260HB2701PN3772 - 35 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the individual, who shall document the instruction and the date of the instruction in the individual's medical record.(c) Revocation.--A health care instruction made by an individual that conflicts with an earlier health care instruction made by the individual, including an instruction documented in a medical order, revokes the earlier instruction to the extent of the conflict.(d) Records.--A health care instruction may be in the same record as a power of attorney for health care.(e) When health care instruction operative.--A health care instruction becomes operative when:(1) it has been communicated to a health care professional; and(2) the individual creating the instruction is determined to lack capacity under this subchapter.(f) Compliance.--When a health care instruction becomes operative, health care professionals shall act in accordance with its provisions or comply with the transfer provisions of section 5424 (relating to refusal to comply).(g) Invalidity of specific direction.--If a specific direction in a health care instruction is held to be invalid, the invalidity does not negate other directions in the health care instruction that can be effected without the invalid direction.(h) Medical record.--Any health care professional to whom a health care instruction is communicated shall make it a part of the medical record of the individual who created the instruction and, if unwilling to comply with the health care instruction, promptly so advise the individual or the individual's surrogate.(i) Duration.--Unless a health care instruction states a 20260HB2701PN3772 - 36 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 time of termination, it is valid until revoked by the individual who created it, notwithstanding the lapse of time since its creation.(j) Absence of health care instruction.--If an individual does not make a health care instruction, a presumption does not arise regarding the intent of the individual to consent to or to refuse the initiation, continuation, withholding or withdrawal of life-sustaining treatment.Section 5. Subchapter C heading of Chapter 54 and section 5451 of Title 20 are repealed:[SUBCHAPTER CHEALTH CARE AGENTS AND REPRESENTATIVES§ 5451. Short title of subchapter.This subchapter shall be known and may be cited as the Health Care Agents and Representatives Act.]Section 6. Title 20 is amended by adding a section to read:§ 5451.1. Advance mental health care directive.(a) Authorization.--An individual may create an advance health care directive that addresses only mental health care for the individual. The directive may include a health care instruction, a power of attorney for health care, or both.(b) Elements.--A health care instruction under this section may include the individual's:(1) general philosophy and objectives regarding mental health care; and(2) specific goals, preferences and wishes regarding the provision, withholding or withdrawal of a form of mental health care, including:(i) preferences regarding professionals, programs and facilities;20260HB2701PN3772 - 37 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (ii) admission to a mental health facility, including duration of admission;(iii) preferences regarding medications;(iv) refusal to accept a specific type of mental health care, including a medication; and(v) preferences regarding crisis intervention.(c) Appointment of health care agent.--A power of attorney for health care under this section may appoint a health care agent to make decisions only for mental health care.(d) Irrevocable.--An individual may direct in an advance mental health care directive that, if the individual is experiencing a psychiatric or psychological event specified in the directive, the individual may not revoke the directive or a part of the directive.(e) Requirements.--If an advance mental health care directive includes a direction under subsection (d), the advance mental health care directive must be in a record that is separate from any other advance health care directive created by the individual and signed by the individual creating the advance mental health care directive and at least two adult witnesses who:(1) attest that to the best of their knowledge the individual:(i) understood the nature and consequences of the direction, including its risks and benefits; and(ii) made the direction voluntarily and without coercion or undue influence;(2) are not:(i) the health care agent appointed by the individual;20260HB2701PN3772 - 38 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (ii) the health care agent's spouse or cohabitant; and(iii) if the individual resides in a long-term care facility, the owner, operator, employee or contractor of the long-term care facility; and(3) are physically present in the same location as the individual.Section 7. Sections 5452, 5453, 5454, 5455, 5456, 5457, 5458, 5459, 5460, 5461, 5462, 5463, 5464 and 5465 of Title 20 are amended to read:§ 5452. [Execution] Health care power of attorney.[(a) Who may make.--An individual of sound mind may make a health care power of attorney if the individual:(1) is 18 years of age or older;(2) has graduated from high school;(3) has married; or(4) is an emancipated minor.(b) Requirements.--A health care power of attorney must be:(1) dated and signed by the principal by signature or mark or by another individual on behalf of and at the direction of the principal if the principal is unable to sign but specifically directs another individual to sign the health care power of attorney; and(2) witnessed by two individuals, each of whom is 18 years of age or older.(c) Witnesses.--(1) An individual who signs a health care power of attorney on behalf of and at the direction of a principal may not witness the health care power of attorney.(2) A health care provider and its agent may not sign a 20260HB2701PN3772 - 39 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 health care power of attorney on behalf of and at the direction of a principal if the health care provider or agent provides health care services to the principal.](a) Authorization.--An individual may create a power of attorney for health care to appoint a health care agent to make health care decisions for the individual.(b) Form.--A power of attorney for health care must be in a record, signed by the individual creating the power and signed by an adult witness who:(1) reasonably believes the act of the individual to create the power of attorney is voluntary and knowing;(2) is not:(i) the health care agent appointed by the individual;(ii) the health care agent's spouse or cohabitant; or(iii) if the individual resides or is receiving care in a long-term care facility, the owner, operator, employee or contractor of the long-term care facility; and(3) is present when the individual signs the power of attorney or when the individual represents that the power of attorney reflects the individual's wishes.(c) Presence.--A witness under subsection (b) is considered present if the witness and the individual are:(1) physically present in the same location;(2) using electronic means that allow for audio and visual transmission and communication in real time to the same extent as if the witness and the individual were physically present in the same location; or20260HB2701PN3772 - 40 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) able to speak to and hear each other in real time through audio connection if:(i) the identity of the individual is personally known to the witness; or(ii) the witness is able to authenticate the identity of the individual by receiving accurate answers from the individual that enable the authentication.§ 5453. Requirements and options for health care power of attorney.(a) General rule.--A health care power of attorney shall:(1) Identify the [principal] individual creating the health care power of attorney and appoint the health care agent.(2) Declare that the [principal] individual authorizes the health care agent to make health care decisions on behalf of the [principal] individual.(b) Optional provisions.--A power of attorney for health care may include a health care instruction. A health care power of attorney may, but need not:(1) Describe any limitations that the [principal] individual creating the health care power of attorney imposes upon the authority of the health care agent.(2) Indicate the intent of the [principal] individual regarding the initiation, continuation, withholding or withdrawal of life-sustaining treatment.(3) Indicate whether the [principal] individual wants tube feeding or any other artificial or invasive form of nutrition or hydration.(4) Disqualify [an] another individual from acting as a [health care representative] default surrogate, prohibit the 20260HB2701PN3772 - 41 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 appointment of [a health care representative] an individual as default surrogate or provide for an order of priority of appointment of a [health care representative] default surrogate pursuant to section 5461(d) (relating to decisions by [health care representative] default surrogate).(5) Nominate a guardian of the person of the [principal] individual as provided in section 5460 (relating to relation of health care agent to court-appointed guardian and other agents).(6) Contain other provisions as the [principal] individual may specify regarding the implementation of health care decisions and related actions by the health care agent or [health care representative] default surrogate.(7) Request that the health care agent or [health care representative] default surrogate exercise [his] sole and absolute discretion to consult the [principal's relative] individual's family member, cleric or physician should the health care agent or [health care representative] default surrogate be uncertain of the [principal's] individual's wishes or best interests.§ 5454. [When health care power of attorney operative.(a) When operative.--Unless otherwise specified in the health care power of attorney, a health care power of attorney becomes operative when:(1) a copy is provided to the attending physician; and(2) the attending physician determines that the principal is incompetent.] Rules for health care power of attorney.(a) (Reserved).(b) [When inoperative.--Unless otherwise specified in the 20260HB2701PN3772 - 42 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 health care power of attorney, a health care power of attorney becomes inoperative during such time as, in the determination of the attending physician, the principal is competent.] (Reserved).(c) Invalidity of specific direction.--If a specific direction in the health care power of attorney is held to be invalid, the invalidity does not negate other directions in the health care power of attorney that can be effected without the invalid direction.(d) Duration.--Unless the health care power of attorney states a time of termination, notwithstanding the lapse of time since the health care power of attorney was [executed] created, the health care power of attorney is valid until revoked by any of the following:(1) The [principal] individual who created the health care power of attorney.(2) The court.(3) If authorized by the court, the [principal's] individual's guardian [of the person].(e) Court approval unnecessary.--A health care decision made by a health care agent for [a principal] an individual is effective without court approval.§ 5455. Appointment of health care agents.[(a) Multiple and successor health care agents.--A principal may appoint the following in a health care power of attorney:(1) More than one health care agent who shall act jointly unless the health care power of attorney expressly provides otherwise.(2) One or more successor agents who shall serve in the order named in the health care power of attorney unless the 20260HB2701PN3772 - 43 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 principal expressly directs to the contrary.](a.1) Co-agents and alternate agents.--(1) An individual in a power of attorney for health care may appoint multiple individuals as co-health care agents. Unless the power of attorney provides otherwise, each co-health care agent may exercise independent authority.(2) An individual in a power of attorney for health care may appoint one or more individuals to act as alternate health care agents if a predecessor agent resigns, dies, becomes disqualified, is not reasonably available or otherwise is unwilling or unable to act as health care agent.(3) Unless the power of attorney provides otherwise, an alternate health care agent has the same authority as the original health care agent:(i) at any time the original health care agent is not reasonably available or is otherwise unwilling or unable to act, for the duration of the unavailability, unwillingness or inability to act; or(ii) if the original health care agent and all other predecessor health care agents have resigned or died or are disqualified from acting as health care agent.(b) Who may not be appointed health care agent.--Unless [related to the principal by blood, marriage or adoption,] a family member or cohabitant of the individual creating the power of attorney for health care, or a descendant of a cohabitant, a health care agent of the [principal] individual may not be any of the following:(1) [The principal's attending physician or other health care provider.] A health care professional providing care to the individual.20260HB2701PN3772 - 44 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) An owner, operator [or], employee or contractor of a [health care provider in which the principal] long-term care facility in which the individual is receiving care.(c) Disqualification.--An individual is disqualified from acting as health care agent for an individual who lacks capacity to make health care decisions if a court finds that the potential health care agent poses a danger to the individual's well-being, even if the court does not issue a protection from abuse order against the potential agent.§ 5456. [Authority] Duties and authority of health care agent.(a) Extent of authority.--An agent or default surrogate has a fiduciary duty to the individual for whom the agent or default surrogate is acting when exercising or purporting to exercise a power. Except as expressly provided otherwise in [a health care power of attorney] an advance health care directive and subject to subsection (b) and section 5460 (relating to relation of health care agent to court-appointed guardian and other agents), a health care agent or default surrogate shall have the authority to make any health care decision and to exercise any right and power regarding the [principal's] individual's care, custody and health care treatment that the [principal] individual could have made and exercised. The foregoing power shall include the power to authorize admission to a medical, nursing, residential or similar facility, or to enter into agreements for the [principal's] individual's care. The health care agent's or default surrogate's authority may extend beyond the [principal's] individual's death to make anatomical gifts, dispose of the remains and consent to autopsies.(b) Life-sustaining treatment decisions.--A life-sustaining treatment decision made by a health care agent is subject to 20260HB2701PN3772 - 45 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 this section and sections 5429 (relating to pregnancy), 5454 (relating to [when] rules for health care power of attorney [operative]) and 5462(a) (relating to duties of [attending physician and health care provider] responsible health care professional and health care institution).(c) Health care decisions.--(1) The health care agent or default surrogate shall gather information on the [principal's] individual's prognosis and acceptable medical alternatives regarding diagnosis, treatments and supportive care.(2) In the case of procedures for which informed consent is required under section 504 of the act of March 20, 2002 (P.L.154, No.13), known as the Medical Care Availability and Reduction of Error (Mcare) Act, the information shall include the information required to be disclosed under that act.(3) In the case of health care decisions regarding end of life of [a patient] an individual with an end-stage medical condition, the information shall distinguish between curative alternatives, palliative alternatives and alternatives which will merely serve to prolong the process of dying. The information shall also distinguish between the [principal's] individual's end-stage medical condition and any other concurrent disease, illness or physical, mental, cognitive or intellectual condition that predated the [principal's] individual's end-stage medical condition.(4) After consultation with health care [providers] professionals and consideration of the information obtained in accordance with paragraphs (1), (2) and (3), the health care agent or default surrogate shall make health care decisions in accordance with the health care agent's 20260HB2701PN3772 - 46 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 understanding and interpretation of the instructions given by the [principal] individual at a time when the [principal] individual had [the capacity to understand, make and communicate health care decisions] capacity. Instructions include an advance health care directive made by the [principal] individual and any clear [written or] directions in a record or by verbal [directions] or nonverbal communications that cover the situation presented.(5) (i) In the absence of instruction, the health care agent or default surrogate shall make health care decisions that conform to the health care agent's or default surrogate's assessment of the [principal's] individual's preferences and values, including religious and moral beliefs.(ii) If the health care agent or default surrogate does not know enough about the [principal's] individual's instructions, preferences and values to decide accordingly, the health care agent or default surrogate shall take into account what the agent or default surrogate knows of the [principal's] individual's instructions, preferences and values, including religious and moral beliefs, and the health care agent's or default surrogate's assessment of the [principal's] individual's best interests, taking into consideration the following goals and considerations of the individual:(A) The preservation of life.(B) The relief from suffering.(C) The preservation or restoration of functioning, taking into account any concurrent disease, illness or physical, mental, cognitive or 20260HB2701PN3772 - 47 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 intellectual condition that may have predated the [principal's] individual's end-stage medical condition.(iii) (A) In the absence of a specific, [written] authorization or direction [by a principal] in a record by an individual to withhold or withdraw nutrition and hydration administered by gastric tube or intravenously or by other artificial or invasive means, a health care agent or default surrogate shall presume that the [principal] individual would not want nutrition and hydration withheld or withdrawn.(B) The presumption may be overcome by previously clearly expressed wishes of the [principal] individual to the contrary. In the absence of such clearly expressed wishes, the presumption may be overcome if the health care agent or default surrogate considers the values and preferences of the [principal] individual and assesses the factors set forth in subparagraphs (i) and (ii) and determines it is clear that the [principal] individual would not wish for artificial nutrition and hydration to be initiated or continued.(6) The Department of Health shall ensure as part of the licensure process that health care [providers] institutions under its jurisdiction have policies and procedures in place to implement this subsection.(d) Health care information.--(1) Unless specifically provided otherwise in a health care power of attorney, a health care agent or default surrogate has the same rights and limitations as the 20260HB2701PN3772 - 48 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 [principal] individual who created the health care power of attorney to request, examine, copy and consent or refuse to consent to the disclosure of medical or other health care information.(2) Disclosure of medical or other health care information to a health care agent or default surrogate does not constitute a waiver of any evidentiary privilege or of a right to assert confidentiality. A health care [provider] professional that discloses such information to a health care agent or default surrogate in good faith shall not be liable for the disclosure. A health care agent or default surrogate may not disclose health care information regarding the [principal] individual except as is reasonably necessary to perform the health care agent's or default surrogate's obligations to the [principal] individual or as otherwise required by law.(e) Revocation.--As soon as reasonably feasible, a health care agent or default surrogate who is informed of a revocation of an advance health care directive or disqualification of the agent or default surrogate shall communicate the revocation or disqualification to a responsible health care professional.(f) Authority commences.--The power of a health care agent or default surrogate commences when the individual is found under section 5448.4(b) (relating to presumption of capacity; overcoming presumption) or by a court to lack capacity to make a health care decision. The power ceases if the individual later is found to have capacity to make a health care decision, or the individual objects under section 5448.5(c) (relating to notice of finding of lack of capacity; right to object) to the finding of lack of capacity under section 5448.4(b). The power resumes 20260HB2701PN3772 - 49 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 if:(1) the power ceased because the individual objected under section 5448.5(c); and(2) the finding of lack of capacity is confirmed under section 5448.5(d)(4) or a court finds that the individual lacks capacity to make a health care decision.(g) Immediate authority.--A power of attorney for health care may provide that the power of an agent under subsection (d)(1) commences on appointment.(h) Insurance and benefits.--If no other person is authorized to do so, a health care agent or default surrogate may apply for public or private health insurance and benefits on behalf of the individual. A health care agent or default surrogate who may apply for insurance and benefits does not, solely by reason of the power, have a duty to apply for the insurance or benefits.(i) Mental health treatment.--A health care agent or default surrogate may not consent to voluntary admission of an individual to a facility for mental health treatment unless:(1) voluntary admission is specifically authorized by the individual in an advance health care directive in a record; and(2) the admission is for no more than the maximum of the number of days specified in the directive or 120 hours, whichever is less.(j) Nursing care.--Except as provided in subsection (k), a health care agent or default surrogate may not consent to placement of an individual in a long-term care facility if the placement is intended to be for more than 100 days if:(1) an alternative living arrangement is reasonably 20260HB2701PN3772 - 50 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 feasible;(2) the individual objects to the placement; or(3) the individual is not terminally ill.(k) Nursing care authorized.--If specifically authorized by the individual in an advance health care directive in a record, a health care agent or default surrogate may consent to placement of the individual in a long-term care facility for more than 100 days even if:(1) an alternative living arrangement is reasonably feasible;(2) the individual objects to the placement; and(3) the individual is not terminally ill.(l) Long-term disability.--If an individual has a long-term disability requiring routine treatment by artificial nutrition, hydration or mechanical ventilation and a history of using the treatment without objection, a health care agent or default surrogate may not consent to withhold or withdraw the treatment unless:(1) the treatment is not necessary to sustain the individual ' s life or maintain the individual ' s well-being; (2) the individual has expressly authorized the withholding or withdrawal in a health care instruction that has not been revoked; or(3) the individual has experienced a major reduction in health or functional ability from which the individual is not expected to recover, even with other appropriate treatment, and the individual has not:(i) given a direction inconsistent with withholding or withdrawal; or(ii) communicated by verbal or nonverbal expression 20260HB2701PN3772 - 51 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 a desire for artificial nutrition, hydration or mechanical ventilation.(m) Limitations.--A default surrogate may not make a health care decision if, under other law of this Commonwealth, the decision:(1) may not be made by a guardian; or(2) may be made by a guardian only if the court appointing the guardian specifically authorizes the guardian to make the decision.§ 5457. [Countermand] Override of health care decision.(a) [Competent principal.--A principal of sound mind may countermand any] General rule.--An individual who has not been found to lack capacity may override a health care decision made by the [principal's] individual's health care agent or default surrogate at any time and in any manner by personally informing [the attending physician or health care provider] a health care professional.(b) [Incompetent principal] Life-sustaining treatment.--Regardless of the [principal's] individual's mental or physical capacity, [a principal] an individual may [countermand] override a health care decision made by the [principal's] individual's health care agent or default surrogate that would withhold or withdraw life-sustaining treatment at any time and in any manner by personally informing [the attending physician] a health care professional.[(c) Attending physician.--The attending physician or health care provider shall make reasonable efforts to promptly inform the health care agent of a countermand under this section.(d) Health care agent.--A countermand exercised under this section shall not affect the authority of a health care agent to 20260HB2701PN3772 - 52 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 make other health care decisions in accordance with the health care power of attorney.](c) Notification.--A health care professional shall make reasonable efforts to promptly notify an individual's health care agent or default surrogate if the individual informs the health care professional of an override under this section.(d) Affect on other decisions.--An override made under this section shall not affect the authority of a health care agent or default surrogate to make other health care decisions in accordance with the individual's advance health care directive.§ 5458. Amendment.[While of sound mind, a principal may amend a health care power of attorney by a writing executed in accordance with the provisions of section 5452 (relating to [execution]. An amendment may include the revocation in part of the health care power of attorney or the designation of new or additional health care agents.] An individual who has not been found to lack capacity may amend all or any portion of an advance health care directive by any clear means. An amendment of a power of attorney for health care must be in a record and signed in accordance with the provisions of section 5452 (relating to health care power of attorney).§ 5459. Revocation.(a) [When health care power of attorney may be revoked.--While of sound mind, a principal may revoke a health care power of attorney by a writing executed in accordance with the provisions of section 5452 (relating to execution) or by personally informing the attending physician, health care provider or health care agent that the health care power of attorney is revoked.] General rule.--An individual may revoke 20260HB2701PN3772 - 53 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the appointment of a health care agent, the designation of a default surrogate or a health care instruction in whole or in part, unless:(1) a court finds the individual lacks capacity to do so;(2) the individual is found under section 5448.4(b) (relating to presumption of capacity; overcoming presumption) to lack capacity to do so and, if the individual objects to the finding, the finding is confirmed under section 5448.5(d)(4) (relating to notice of finding of lack of capacity; right to object); or(3) the individual created an advance mental health care directive that includes the provision under section 5451.1(d) (relating to advance mental health care directive) and the individual is experiencing the psychiatric or psychological event specified in the directive.(a.1) Manner of revocation.--Revocation under subsection (a) may be by any act of the individual that clearly indicates that the individual intends to revoke the appointment, designation or instruction, including an oral statement to a health care professional.(a.2) Marriage.--Unless otherwise provided in an individual's power of attorney for health care, the appointment of a spouse or domestic partner or life partner of the individual as health care agent for the individual is revoked if:(1) a petition for annulment, divorce, dissolution of marriage, legal separation or termination has been filed and not dismissed or withdrawn;(2) a decree of annulment, divorce, dissolution of 20260HB2701PN3772 - 54 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 marriage, legal separation or termination has been issued;(3) the individual and the spouse or domestic partner or life partner have agreed in a record to a legal separation; or(4) the spouse or domestic partner or life partner has deserted the individual for more than one year.(b) [Reliance on health care power of attorney.--A health care provider may rely on the effectiveness of a health care power of attorney unless notified of its revocation.] (Reserved).(c) Subsequent action by agent.--A health care agent, knowing of the revocation of [the] a health care power of attorney, may not make or attempt to make health care decisions for the [principal] individual who created the health care power of attorney.§ 5460. Relation of health care agent to court-appointed guardian and other agents.[(a) Accountability of health care agent.--If a principal who has executed a health care power of attorney is later adjudicated an incapacitated person and a guardian of the person to make health care decisions is appointed by a court, the health care agent is accountable to the guardian as well as to the principal. In its guardianship order and determination of a person's incapacity, the court shall determine the extent to which the health care agent's authority to act remains in effect.](a.1) Decisions by guardian.--(1) A guardian may refuse to comply with or revoke an individual's advance health care directive only if the court appointing the guardian expressly orders the noncompliance or 20260HB2701PN3772 - 55 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 revocation.(2) Unless a court orders otherwise, a health care decision made by a health care agent appointed by an individual subject to guardianship prevails over a decision of the guardian appointed for the individual.(b) Nomination of guardian of person.--In [a health care power of attorney, a principal] an advance health care directive, an individual may nominate a guardian [of the person for the principal] for the individual for consideration by a court if [incapacity] proceedings under section 5512.1 (relating to determination of incapacity and appointment of guardian) for the [principal's] individual's person are thereafter commenced. If a court determines that the appointment of a guardian is necessary, the court shall appoint a guardian in accordance with the [principal's] individual's most recent nomination except for good cause or disqualification.(c) Reasonable expenses.--In fulfilling the health care needs for [a principal] an individual, a health care agent may incur reasonable expenses, including the purchase of health care insurance, to the extent the expenses are not otherwise covered by insurance or other similar benefits. Payment for the expenses or reimbursement to the health care agent for the expenses from the [principal's] individual's funds shall be made by either of the following:(1) A guardian of the estate of the [principal] individual.(2) [An agent] A person acting on behalf of the [principal] individual under a power of attorney other than a power of attorney for health care if the agent has the power to disburse the funds of the [principal] individual under the 20260HB2701PN3772 - 56 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 power of attorney for health care or other law.§ 5461. Decisions by [health care representative] default surrogate.(a) [General rule] Authorization.--A [health care representative] default surrogate may make a health care decision for an individual [whose attending physician has determined that the individual is incompetent] who has been found to lack capacity if:(1) the [individual is at least 18 years of age, has graduated from high school, has married or is an emancipated minor] default surrogate has capacity to make health care decisions;(2) (i) the individual does not have a health care power of attorney; or(ii) the individual's health care agent is not reasonably available [or has indicated an unwillingness to act] and no alternate health care agent is reasonably available; and(3) a guardian [of the person] authorized to make health care decisions has not been appointed for the individual.(b) Application.--This section applies to decisions regarding treatment, care, goods or services that a caretaker is obligated to provide to a care-dependent person who has an end-stage medical condition or is permanently unconscious as permitted under 18 Pa.C.S. § 2713(e)(5) (relating to neglect of care-dependent person).(c) [Extent of authority of health care representative.--Except as set forth in section 5462(c)(1) (relating to duties of attending physician and health care provider), the authority and the decision-making process of a health care representative 20260HB2701PN3772 - 57 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 shall be the same as provided for a health care agent in section 5456 (relating to authority of health care agent) and 5460(c) (relating to relation of health care agent to court-appointed guardian and other agents).] (Reserved).(d) Who may act as [health care representative] default surrogate.--[(1) An individual of sound mind may, by a signed writing or by personally informing the attending physician or the health care provider, designate one or more individuals to act as health care representative. In the absence of a designation or if no designee is reasonably available, any member of the following classes, in descending order of priority, who is reasonably available may act as health care representative:(i) The spouse, unless an action for divorce is pending, and the adult children of the principal who are not the children of the spouse.(ii) An adult child.(iii) A parent.(iv) An adult brother or sister.(v) An adult grandchild.(vi) An adult who has knowledge of the principal's preferences and values, including, but not limited to, religious and moral beliefs, to assess how the principal would make health care decisions.](1.1) Unless an individual has an advance health care directive that indicates otherwise, a member of the following classes, in descending order of priority, who is reasonably available and not disqualified under subsection (e) may act as default surrogate for the individual:20260HB2701PN3772 - 58 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (i) an adult the individual has identified, other than in a power of attorney for health care, to make a health care decision for the individual if the individual cannot make the decision;(ii) the individual's spouse or domestic partner or life partner unless:(A) a petition for annulment, divorce, dissolution of marriage, legal separation or termination has been filed and not dismissed or withdrawn;(B) a decree of annulment, divorce, dissolution of marriage, legal separation or termination has been issued;(C) the individual and the spouse or domestic partner or life partner have agreed in a record to a legal separation; or(D) the spouse or domestic partner or life partner has abandoned the individual for more than one year;(iii) the individual's cohabitant;(iv) the individual's adult child or parent;(v) the individual's adult sibling;(vi) the individual's adult grandchild or grandparent;(vii) an adult not listed in subparagraphs (i), (ii), (iii), (iv), (v) and (vi) who has assisted the individual with supported decision making routinely during the preceding six months;(viii) the individual's adult stepchild not listed in subparagraphs (i), (ii), (iii), (iv), (v), (vi) and 20260HB2701PN3772 - 59 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (vii) who the individual actively parented during the stepchild's minor years and with whom the individual has an ongoing relationship; or(ix) an adult not listed in subparagraphs (i), (ii), (iii), (iv), (v), (vi), (vii) and (viii) who has exhibited special care and concern for the individual and is familiar with the individual's preferences and values, including, but not limited to, religious and moral beliefs, to assess how the individual would make health care decisions.(2) [ An individual may by signed writing, including a health care power of attorney, provide for a different order of priority.] (Reserved).(3) An individual with a higher priority who is willing to act as a [health care representative] default surrogate may assume the authority to act notwithstanding the fact that another individual has previously assumed that authority.(4) If a responsible health care professional reasonably determines that an individual who assumed authority to act as a default surrogate is not willing or able to comply with a duty under section 5456 (relating to duties and authority of health care agent) or fails to comply with the duty in a timely manner, the professional may recognize the individual next in priority under paragraph (1.1) as the default surrogate.(e) Disqualification.--[An individual of sound mind may disqualify one or more individuals from acting as health care representative in the same manner as specified under subsection (d) for the designation of a health care representative. An individual may also disqualify one or more individuals from 20260HB2701PN3772 - 60 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 acting as health care representative by a health care power of attorney. Upon the petition of any member of the classes set forth in subsection (d), the court may disqualify for cause shown an individual otherwise eligible to serve as a health care representative.](1) An individual for whom a health care decision would be made may disqualify a potential default surrogate from acting as default surrogate for the individual. The disqualification must be in a record signed by the potential default surrogate or communicated verbally or nonverbally to the individual being disqualified, another individual or a responsible health care professional. Disqualification under this subsection is effective even if made by an individual who lacks capacity to make a health care advance directive if the individual clearly communicates a desire that the potential default surrogate being disqualified not make health care decisions for the individual.(2) An individual is disqualified from acting as a default surrogate for an individual who lacks capacity to make health care decisions if:(i) a court finds that the potential default surrogate poses a danger to the individual's well-being, even if the court does not issue a protection from abuse order against the potential default surrogate;(ii) the potential default surrogate is a health care professional providing care to the individual or is an owner, operator, employee or contractor of a long-term care facility in which the individual is residing or receiving care unless the owner, operator, employee or contractor is a family member of the individual, the 20260HB2701PN3772 - 61 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 cohabitant of the individual or a descendant of the cohabitant; or(iii) the potential default surrogate refuses to provide a timely declaration under subsection (k).(f) [Limitation on designation of health care representative.--Unless related by blood, marriage or adoption, a health care representative may not be the principal's attending physician or other health care provider nor an owner, operator or employee of a health care provider in which the principal receives care.] (Reserved).(g) Decision of [health care representative] default surrogate.--[(1) If more than one member of a class assumes authority to act as a health care representative, the members do not agree on a health care decision and the attending physician or health care provider is so informed, the attending physician or health care provider may rely on the decision of a majority of the members of that class who have communicated their views to the attending physician or health care provider.(2) If the members of the class of health care representatives are evenly divided concerning the health care decision and the attending physician or health care provider is so informed, an individual having a lower priority may not act as a health care representative. So long as the class remains evenly divided, no decision shall be deemed made until such time as the parties resolve their disagreement. Notwithstanding such disagreement, nothing in this subsection shall be construed to preclude the administration of health care treatment in accordance with accepted standards of 20260HB2701PN3772 - 62 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 medical practice.](3) A default surrogate who assumes authority under subsection (d) shall inform a responsible health care professional if two or more members of a class under subsection (d) have assumed authority to act as default surrogates and the members do not agree on a health care decision.(4) A responsible health care professional shall comply with the decision of a majority of the members of the class with highest priority under subsection (d) who have communicated their views to the professional and the professional reasonably believes are acting consistent with their duties under section 5456.(5) If a responsible health care professional is informed that the members of the class who have communicated their views to the professional are evenly divided concerning the health care decision, the professional shall make a reasonable effort to solicit the views of members of the class who are reasonably available but have not yet communicated their views to the professional. The professional, after the solicitation, shall comply with the decision of a majority of the members who have communicated their views to the professional and the professional reasonably believes are acting consistent with their duties under section 5456. Subject to paragraph (6), so long as the class remains evenly divided, no decision shall be deemed made until such time as the parties resolve their disagreement. Notwithstanding such disagreement, nothing in this subsection shall be construed to preclude the administration of health care treatment in accordance with 20260HB2701PN3772 - 63 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 accepted standards of medical practice.(6) If the class remains evenly divided after the effort is made under paragraph (5), the health care decision must be made as provided by other law of this Commonwealth regarding the treatment of an individual who is found to lack capacity, including Chapter 55 (relating to incapacitated persons).(h) Duty of [health care representative] default surrogate.--Promptly upon assuming authority to act, a [health care representative] default surrogate shall communicate the assumption of authority to the members of the [principal's family] classes specified in subsection (d) who can be readily contacted.(i) [Countermand of health care decision.--(1) A principal of sound mind may countermand any health care decision made by the principal's health care representative at any time and in any manner by personally informing the attending physician or health care provider.(2) Regardless of the principal's mental or physical capacity, a principal may countermand a health care decision made by the principal's health care representative that would withhold or withdraw life-sustaining treatment at any time and in any manner by personally informing the attending physician.(3) The attending physician or health care provider shall make reasonable efforts to promptly inform the =health care representative of a countermand exercised under this section.(4) A countermand exercised under this section shall not affect the authority of the health care representative to make other health care decisions.] (Reserved).20260HB2701PN3772 - 64 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (j) Court approval unnecessary.--A health care decision made by a [health care representative] default surrogate for a principal shall be effective without court approval.(k) Written declaration of [health care representative.--An attending physician or health care provider may require a person] default surrogate.--A responsible health care professional may require an individual claiming the right to act as [health care representative for a principal] default surrogate to provide a written declaration in a record made under penalty of perjury stating facts and circumstances reasonably sufficient to establish the claimed authority.§ 5462. [Duties of attending physician and health care provider.(a) Duty to certify end-stage medical condition.--Promptly after a determination that a principal has an end-stage medical condition or is permanently unconscious, the attending physician shall certify in writing that the principal has an end-stage medical condition or is permanently unconscious.] Duties of responsible health care professional and health care institution.(a) (Reserved).(a.1) Identify surrogate.--A responsible health care professional who is aware that an individual has been found to lack capacity to make a health care decision shall make a reasonable effort to determine if the individual has a surrogate.(b) Communication of health care decision.--Whenever possible before implementing a health care decision made by a [health care representative] default surrogate or health care agent, [an attending physician or health care provider] a 20260HB2701PN3772 - 65 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 responsible health care professional shall promptly communicate to the [principal] individual the decision and the identity of the [person] individual making the decision.(c) Compliance with decisions of health care agent and [health care representative] default surrogate.--(1) Health care necessary to preserve life shall be provided to an individual who has neither an end-stage medical condition nor is permanently unconscious, except if the individual [is competent] has capacity and objects to such care or a health care agent or default surrogate objects on behalf of the [principal] individual if authorized to do so by the individual's health care power of attorney or [living will] health care instruction. [In every other case, subject to any limitation specified in the health care power of attorney, an attending physician or health care provider shall comply with a health care decision made by a health care agent or health care representative to the same extent as if the decision had been made by the principal.](1.1) Except as provided in section 5424(a) and (b) (relating to refusal to comply), a health care professional or health care institution providing health care to an individual shall comply with:(i) a health care instruction given by the individual regarding the individual's health care;(ii) a reasonable interpretation by the individual's surrogate of an instruction given by the individual; and(iii) a health care decision for the individual made by the individual's surrogate in accordance with section 5456 (relating to duties and authority of health care agent) to the same extent as if the decision had been 20260HB2701PN3772 - 66 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 made by the individual at a time when the individual had capacity.(2) In all circumstances this subsection shall be construed so as to be consistent with the Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990 (Public Law 101-336, 104 Stat. 327).(d) Medical record.--[(1) An attending physician or health care provider who is given a health care power of attorney shall arrange for the health care power of attorney or a copy to be placed in the medical record of the principal.(2) An attending physician or health care provider to whom an amendment or revocation of a health care power of attorney is communicated shall promptly enter the information in the medical record of the principal and maintain a copy if one is furnished.](3) A responsible health care professional who is informed that an individual has created or revoked an advance health care directive, or that a surrogate for an individual has been appointed, designated or disqualified, shall:(i) document the information as soon as reasonably feasible in the individual's medical record; and(ii) if evidence of the directive, revocation, appointment, designation or disqualification is in a record, request a copy and, on receipt, cause the copy to be included in the individual's medical record.(e) Record of determination.--[An attending physician who determines that a principal is incompetent or has become competent or makes a determination that affects the authority of a health care agent shall enter the determination in the medical record of the principal and, if possible, promptly inform the 20260HB2701PN3772 - 67 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 principal and any health care agent of the determination.] A responsible health care professional who makes or is informed of a finding that an individual lacks capacity to make a health care decision or no longer lacks capacity, or that other circumstances exist that affect a health care instruction or the authority of a surrogate, as soon as reasonably feasible, shall:(1) document the finding or circumstance in the individual's medical record; and(2) if possible, communicate to the individual and the individual's surrogate the finding or circumstance and that the individual may object under section 5448.5(c) (relating to notice of finding of lack of capacity; right to object) to the finding under section 5448.4(b) (relating to presumption of capacity; overcoming presumption).§ 5463. Effect on other [State] Commonwealth law.(a) Mental health.--This subchapter does not affect the requirements of other laws of this Commonwealth regarding consent to observation, diagnosis, treatment or hospitalization for a mental illness.(b) Prohibited care.--This subchapter does not authorize a [health care agent or health care representative] default surrogate to consent to any health care prohibited by the laws of this Commonwealth.(c) Consent.--This subchapter does not affect the laws of this Commonwealth regarding any of the following:(1) The standard of care of a health care [provider] professional or health care institution required in the administration of health care.(2) When consent is required for health care.(3) Informed consent for health care.20260HB2701PN3772 - 68 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (4) Consent to health care in an emergency.(d) Preservation of religious rights.--This subchapter does not prevent a [health care agent or health care representative] default surrogate from consenting to health care administered in good faith pursuant to religious beliefs of [the principal] an individual or from withholding consent to health care that is contrary to religious beliefs of the [principal] individual.(e) Rights of individuals.--This subchapter does not affect the right of an individual to make health care decisions.(f) Disclosure.--The disclosure requirements of section 5456(d) (relating to duties and authority of health care agent) supersede any provision in any other [State statute or regulation] law of this Commonwealth that requires [the principal] an individual to consent to disclosure or which otherwise conflicts with section 5456(d), including, but not limited to, the following:(1) Section 8 of the act of April 14, 1972 (P.L.221, No.63), known as the Pennsylvania Drug and Alcohol Abuse Control Act.(2) Section 111 of the act of July 9, 1976 (P.L.817, No.143), known as the Mental Health Procedures Act.(3) Section 15 of the act of October 5, 1978 (P.L.1109, No.261), known as the Osteopathic Medical Practice Act.(4) Section 41 of the act of December 20, 1985 (P.L.457, No.112), known as the Medical Practice Act of 1985.(5) Section 7 of the act of November 29, 1990 (P.L.585, No.148), known as the Confidentiality of HIV-Related Information Act.§ 5464. Validity of advance health care directive.[This subchapter does not limit the validity of a power of 20260HB2701PN3772 - 69 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 attorney executed prior to the effective date of this subchapter. A health care power of attorney executed in another state or jurisdiction and in conformity with the laws of that state or jurisdiction shall be considered valid in this Commonwealth, except to the extent that the health care power of attorney executed in another state or jurisdiction would allow a health care agent to make a health care decision inconsistent with the laws of this Commonwealth.](a) Directives created in other states.--An advance health care directive created outside this Commonwealth is valid if it complies with this chapter or the law of the state specified in the directive or, if a state is not specified, the state in which the individual created the directive.(b) Reliance.--A person may assume without inquiry that an advance health care directive is genuine, valid and still in effect, and may implement and rely on it, unless the person has good cause to believe the directive is invalid or has been revoked.(c) Electronic form.--An advance health care directive, revocation of a directive or a signature on a directive or revocation may not be denied legal effect or enforceability solely because it is in electronic form. Evidence relating to an advance health care directive, revocation of a directive or a signature on a directive or revocation may not be excluded in a proceeding solely because the evidence is in electronic form.(d) Other law.--This chapter does not affect the validity of an electronic record or signature that is valid under the act of December 16, 1999 (P.L.971, No.69), known as the Electronic Transactions Act.(e) Conflicts with other law.--If this chapter conflicts 20260HB2701PN3772 - 70 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 with other law of this Commonwealth relating to the creation, execution, implementation or revocation of an advance health care directive, this chapter prevails.§ 5465. Form.[A health care power of attorney may be in any written form identifying the principal, appointing a health care agent and declaring that the principal authorizes the health care agent to make health care decisions on behalf of the principal. An example of a health care power of attorney appears in the combined form set forth in Subchapter D (relating to combined form).] An advance health care directive may be in a record that combines a power of attorney for health care with a health care instruction.Section 8. Title 20 is amended by adding a section to read:§ 5466. Effect of copy; certified physical copy.(a) Same effect.--A physical or electronic copy of an advance health care directive, revocation of an advance health care directive or appointment, designation or disqualification of a surrogate has the same effect as the original.(b) Copies.--An individual may create a certified physical copy of an advance health care directive or revocation of an advance health care directive that is in electronic form by affirming under penalty of perjury that the physical copy is a complete and accurate copy of the directive or revocation.Section 9. Section 5471 of Title 20 is repealed:[§ 5471. Example.The following is an example of a document that combines a living will and health care power of attorney:DURABLE HEALTH CARE POWER OF ATTORNEYAND HEALTH CARE TREATMENT INSTRUCTIONS20260HB2701PN3772 - 71 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (LIVING WILL)PART IINTRODUCTORY REMARKS ONHEALTH CARE DECISION MAKINGYou have the right to decide the type of health care you want.Should you become unable to understand, make or communicate decisions about medical care, your wishes for medical treatment are most likely to be followed if you express those wishes in advance by:(1) naming a health care agent to decide treatment for you; and(2) giving health care treatment instructions to your health care agent or health care provider.An advance health care directive is a written set of instructions expressing your wishes for medical treatment.NOTICE ABOUT ANATOMICAL DONATIONThis document may also contain directions regarding whether you wish to donate an organ, tissue or eyes. Under Pennsylvania law, donating a part of the body for transplantation or research is a voluntary act. You do not have to donate an organ, tissue, eye or other part of the body. However, it is important that you make your wishes about anatomical donation known, just as it is important to make your choices about end-of-life care known.Surgeons have made great strides in the field of organ donation and can now transplant hands, facial tissue and limbs. A hand, facial tissue and a limb are examples of what is known as a vascularized composite allograft. Under Pennsylvania law, explicit and specific consent to donate 20260HB2701PN3772 - 72 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 hands, facial tissue, limbs or other vascularized composite allografts must be given. You may use this document to make clear your wish to donate or not to donate hands, facial tissue or limbs.Under Pennsylvania law, the organ donor designation on the driver's license authorizes the individual to donate what we traditionally think of as organs (heart, lung, liver, kidney) and tissue and does not authorize the individual to donate hands, facial tissue, limbs or other vascularized composite allografts.Detailed information about anatomical donation, including the procedure used to recover organs, tissues and eyes, can be found on the Department of Transportation's Internet website. Information about the donation of hands, facial tissue and limbs can also be found on the Department of Transportation's Internet website.You may wish to consult with your physician or your attorney to determine whether the procedure for making an anatomical donation is compatible with fulfilling your specific choices for end-of-life care. In addition, you may want to consult with clergy regarding whether you want to donate an organ, a hand, facial tissue or limb or other part of the body. It is important to understand that donating a hand, limb or facial tissue may have an impact on funeral arrangements and that an open casket may not be possible.An advance health care directive may contain a health care power of attorney, where you name a person called a "health care agent" to decide treatment for you, and a living will, where you tell your health care agent and health care providers your choices regarding the initiation, 20260HB2701PN3772 - 73 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 continuation, withholding or withdrawal of life-sustaining treatment and other specific directions regarding end-of-life care and your views regarding organ and tissue donation.You may limit your health care agent's involvement in deciding your medical treatment so that your health care agent will speak for you only when you are unable to speak for yourself or you may give your health care agent the power to speak for you immediately. This combined form gives your health care agent the power to speak for you only when you are unable to speak for yourself. A living will cannot be followed unless your attending physician determines that you lack the ability to understand, make or communicate health care decisions for yourself and you are either permanently unconscious or you have an end-stage medical condition, which is a condition that will result in death despite the introduction or continuation of medical treatment. You, and not your health care agent, remain responsible for the cost of your medical care.If you do not write down your wishes about your health care in advance, and if later you become unable to understand, make or communicate these decisions, those wishes may not be honored because they may remain unknown to others.A health care provider who refuses to honor your wishes about health care must tell you of its refusal and help to transfer you to a health care provider who will honor your wishes.You should give a copy of your advance health care directive (a living will, health care power of attorney or a document containing both) to your health care agent, your physicians, family members and others whom you expect would 20260HB2701PN3772 - 74 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 likely attend to your needs if you become unable to understand, make or communicate decisions about medical care. If your health care wishes change, tell your physician and write a new advance health care directive to replace your old one. If your wishes about donating an organ, tissue or eyes change, tell your physician and write a new advance health care directive to replace your old one. If you do not wish to donate a hand, facial tissue or limb, it is important to make that clear in your advance health care directive or health care power of attorney, or both. It is important in selecting a health care agent that you choose a person you trust who is likely to be available in a medical situation where you cannot make decisions for yourself. You should inform that person that you have appointed him or her as your health care agent and discuss your beliefs and values with him or her so that your health care agent will understand your health care objectives, including whether you want to limit or withhold life-sustaining measures in the event that you become permanently unconscious or have an end-stage medical condition. You should also tell your health care agent whether you want to donate organs, tissue, eyes or other parts of the body and whether you want to make a donation of your hands, facial tissue or limbs. It is important to understand that if you decide to donate a hand, limb or facial tissue it may impact funeral arrangements and that an open casket may not be possible.You may wish to consult with knowledgeable, trusted individuals such as family members, your physician or clergy when considering an expression of your values and health care wishes. You are free to create your own advance health care 20260HB2701PN3772 - 75 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 directive to convey your wishes regarding medical treatment. The following form is an example of an advance health care directive that combines a health care power of attorney with a living will.NOTES ABOUT THE USE OF THIS FORMIf you decide to use this form or create your own advance health care directive, you should consult with your physician and your attorney to make sure that your wishes are clearly expressed and comply with the law.If you decide to use this form but disagree with any of its statements, you may cross out those statements.You may add comments to this form or use your own form to help your physician or health care agent decide your medical care.This form is designed to give your health care agent broad powers to make health care decisions for you whenever you cannot make them for yourself. It is also designed to express a desire to limit or authorize care if you have an end-stage medical condition or are permanently unconscious. If you do not desire to give your health care agent broad powers, or you do not wish to limit your care if you have an end-stage medical condition or are permanently unconscious, you may wish to use a different form or create your own. YOU SHOULD ALSO USE A DIFFERENT FORM IF YOU WISH TO EXPRESS YOUR PREFERENCES IN MORE DETAIL THAN THIS FORM ALLOWS OR IF YOU WISH FOR YOUR HEALTH CARE AGENT TO BE ABLE TO SPEAK FOR YOU IMMEDIATELY. In these situations, it is particularly important that you consult with your attorney and physician to make sure that your wishes are clearly expressed, including whether you want to limit or withhold life-20260HB2701PN3772 - 76 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 sustaining measures in the event that you become permanently unconscious or have an end-stage medical condition and whether you wish to donate a part of the body for transplantation or research. You should also clearly express whether or not you wish to donate hands, facial tissue or limbs.This form allows you to tell your health care agent your goals if you have an end-stage medical condition or other extreme and irreversible medical condition, such as advanced Alzheimer's disease. Do you want medical care applied aggressively in these situations or would you consider such aggressive medical care burdensome and undesirable?You may choose whether you want your health care agent to be bound by your instructions or whether you want your health care agent to be able to decide at the time what course of treatment the health care agent thinks most fully reflects your wishes and values.If you are a woman and diagnosed as being pregnant at the time a health care decision would otherwise be made pursuant to this form, the laws of this Commonwealth prohibit implementation of that decision if it directs that life-sustaining treatment, including nutrition and hydration, be withheld or withdrawn from you, unless your attending physician and an obstetrician who have examined you certify in your medical record that the life-sustaining treatment:(1) will not maintain you in such a way as to permit the continuing development and live birth of the unborn child;(2) will be physically harmful to you; or(3) will cause pain to you that cannot be alleviated by medication.20260HB2701PN3772 - 77 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 A physician is not required to perform a pregnancy test on you unless the physician has reason to believe that you may be pregnant.Pennsylvania law protects your health care agent and health care providers from any legal liability for following in good faith your wishes as expressed in the form or by your health care agent's direction. It does not otherwise change professional standards or excuse negligence in the way your wishes are carried out. If you have any questions about the law, consult an attorney for guidance.This form and explanation is not intended to take the place of specific legal or medical advice for which you should rely upon your own attorney and physician.PART IIDURABLE HEALTH CARE POWER OF ATTORNEYI,........................, of.................... County, Pennsylvania, appoint the person named below to be my health care agent to make health and personal care decisions for me.Effective immediately and continuously until my death or revocation by a writing signed by me or someone authorized to make health care treatment decisions for me, I authorize all health care providers or other covered entities to disclose to my health care agent, upon my agent's request, any information, oral or written, regarding my physical or mental health, including, but not limited to, medical and hospital records and what is otherwise private, privileged, protected or personal health information, such as health information as defined and described in the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 (Public Law 104-191, 110 Stat. 20260HB2701PN3772 - 78 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 1936), the regulations promulgated thereunder and any other State or local laws and rules. Information disclosed by a health care provider or other covered entity may be redisclosed and may no longer be subject to the privacy rules provided by 45 C.F.R. Pt. 164.The remainder of this document will take effect when and only when I lack the ability to understand, make or communicate a choice regarding a health or personal care decision as verified by my attending physician. My health care agent may not delegate the authority to make decisions.MY HEALTH CARE AGENT HAS ALL OF THE FOLLOWING POWERS SUBJECT TO THE HEALTH CARE TREATMENT INSTRUCTIONS THAT FOLLOW IN PART III (CROSS OUT ANY POWERS YOU DO NOT WANT TO GIVE YOUR HEALTH CARE AGENT):1. To authorize, withhold or withdraw medical care and surgical procedures.2. To authorize, withhold or withdraw nutrition (food) or hydration (water) medically supplied by tube through my nose, stomach, intestines, arteries or veins.3. To authorize my admission to or discharge from a medical, nursing, residential or similar facility and to make agreements for my care and health insurance for my care, including hospice and/or palliative care.4. To hire and fire medical, social service and other support personnel responsible for my care.5. To take any legal action necessary to do what I have directed.6. To request that a physician responsible for my care issue a do-not-resuscitate (DNR) order, including an out-of-hospital DNR order, and sign any required documents and 20260HB2701PN3772 - 79 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 consents.7. To authorize or refuse to authorize donation of what we traditionally think of as organs (for example, heart, lung, liver, kidney), tissue, eyes or other parts of the body.8. To authorize or refuse to authorize donation of hands, facial tissue, limbs or other vascularized composite allografts.APPOINTMENT OF HEALTH CARE AGENTI appoint the following health care agent:Health Care Agent:................................... (Name and relationship)Address:..................................................................................................Telephone Number: Home............. Work............E-mail:..............................................IF YOU DO NOT NAME A HEALTH CARE AGENT, HEALTH CARE PROVIDERS WILL ASK YOUR FAMILY OR AN ADULT WHO KNOWS YOUR PREFERENCES AND VALUES FOR HELP IN DETERMINING YOUR WISHES FOR TREATMENT. NOTE THAT YOU MAY NOT APPOINT YOUR DOCTOR OR OTHER HEALTH CARE PROVIDER AS YOUR HEALTH CARE AGENT UNLESS RELATED TO YOU BY BLOOD, MARRIAGE OR ADOPTION.If my health care agent is not readily available or if my health care agent is my spouse and an action for divorce is filed by either of us after the date of this document, I appoint the person or persons named below in the order named. (It is helpful, but not required, to name alternative health care agents.)First Alternative Health Care Agent:................. (Name and relationship)20260HB2701PN3772 - 80 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Address:..................................................................................................Telephone Number: Home............. Work............E-mail:..............................................Second Alternative Health Care Agent:................ (Name and relationship)Address:..................................................................................................Telephone Number: Home............. Work............E-mail:..............................................GUIDANCE FOR HEALTH CARE AGENT (OPTIONAL) GOALSIf I have an end-stage medical condition or other extreme irreversible medical condition, my goals in making medical decisions are as follows (insert your personal priorities such as comfort, care, preservation of mental function, etc.):..............................................................................................................................................................................................................................SEVERE BRAIN DAMAGE OR BRAIN DISEASEIf I should suffer from severe and irreversible brain damage or brain disease with no realistic hope of significant recovery, I would consider such a condition intolerable and the application of aggressive medical care to be burdensome. I therefore request that my health care agent respond to any intervening (other and separate) life-threatening conditions in the same manner as directed for an end-stage medical condition or state of permanent unconsciousness as I have indicated below.Initials..............I agree20260HB2701PN3772 - 81 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Initials..............I disagreePART IIIHEALTH CARE TREATMENT INSTRUCTIONS IN THE EVENTOF END-STAGE MEDICAL CONDITIONOR PERMANENT UNCONSCIOUSNESS(LIVING WILL)The following health care treatment instructions exercise my right to make my own health care decisions. These instructions are intended to provide clear and convincing evidence of my wishes to be followed when I lack the capacity to understand, make or communicate my treatment decisions:IF I HAVE AN END-STAGE MEDICAL CONDITION (WHICH WILL RESULT IN MY DEATH, DESPITE THE INTRODUCTION OR CONTINUATION OF MEDICAL TREATMENT) OR AM PERMANENTLY UNCONSCIOUS SUCH AS AN IRREVERSIBLE COMA OR AN IRREVERSIBLE VEGETATIVE STATE AND THERE IS NO REALISTIC HOPE OF SIGNIFICANT RECOVERY, ALL OF THE FOLLOWING APPLY (CROSS OUT ANY TREATMENT INSTRUCTIONS WITH WHICH YOU DO NOT AGREE):1. I direct that I be given health care treatment to relieve pain or provide comfort even if such treatment might shorten my life, suppress my appetite or my breathing, or be habit forming.2. I direct that all life prolonging procedures be withheld or withdrawn. You may want to consult with your physician and attorney in order to determine whether your designated choices regarding end-of-life care are compatible with anatomical donation. In order to donate an organ your body may need to be maintained on artificial support after you have been declared dead to facilitate anatomical donation. Detailed information about the procedure for being 20260HB2701PN3772 - 82 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 declared brain dead or dead by lack of cardiac function and information about organ donation can be found on the Department of Transportation's publicly accessible Internet website.3. I specifically do not want any of the following as life prolonging procedures: (If you wish to receive any of these treatments, write "I do want" after the treatment)heart-lung resuscitation (CPR)....................mechanical ventilator (breathing machine).........dialysis (kidney machine).........................surgery...........................................chemotherapy......................................radiation treatment...............................antibiotics.......................................Please indicate whether you want nutrition (food) or hydration (water) medically supplied by a tube into your nose, stomach, intestine, arteries, or veins if you have an end-stage medical condition or are permanently unconscious and there is no realistic hope of significant recovery. (Initial only one statement.)TUBE FEEDINGS........I want tube feedings to be givenORNO TUBE FEEDINGS........I do not want tube feedings to be given.4. If I have authorized donation of an organ (such as a heart, liver or lung) or a vascularized composite allograft in the next section of this document, I authorize the use of artificial support, including a ventilator, for a limited period of time after I am declared dead to facilitate the 20260HB2701PN3772 - 83 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 donation.5. I specifically do not want to be on artificial support after I am declared dead.......................HEALTH CARE AGENT'S USE OF INSTRUCTIONS(INITIAL ONE OPTION ONLY).........My health care agent must follow these instructions.OR........These instructions are only guidance.My health care agent shall have final say and may override any of my instructions. (Indicate any exceptions).................................................................................If I did not appoint a health care agent, these instructions shall be followed.LEGAL PROTECTIONPennsylvania law protects my health care agent and health care providers from any legal liability for their good faith actions in following my wishes as expressed in this form or in complying with my health care agent's direction. On behalf of myself, my executors and heirs, I further hold my health care agent and my health care providers harmless and indemnify them against any claim for their good faith actions in recognizing my health care agent's authority or in following my treatment instructions.SIGNATURE..................................................INFORMATION ABOUT ANATOMICAL DONATIONDonating an organ or other part of the body is a voluntary act. Under Pennsylvania law, you do not have to donate an organ or any other part of your body. It is 20260HB2701PN3772 - 84 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 important to know the effect of organ donation on your decisions about end-of-life care so that your wishes about end-of-life care will be fulfilled. If someone wishes to become an organ donor, the person may be kept on artificial support after the person has been declared dead to facilitate anatomical donation. Detailed information about the procedure for recovering organs and other parts of the body and detailed information about brain death and cardiac death may be found on the Department of Transportation's publicly accessible Internet website.Under Pennsylvania law, the organ donor designation on the driver's license authorizes the individual to donate what we traditionally think of as organs (for example, heart, lung, liver, kidney) and tissue and does not authorize the individual to donate hands, facial tissue, limbs or other vascularized composite allografts.Under Pennsylvania law, explicit and specific consent to donate hands, facial tissue, limbs and other vascularized composite allografts is needed. Donation of these parts of the body is voluntary. Information about the procedure to transplant hands, facial tissue and limbs can be found on the Department of Transportation's publicly accessible Internet website. It is important to know that donating a hand, limb or facial tissue may impact funeral arrangements and that an open casket may not be possible.ORGAN DONATION........I consent to making an anatomical gift. This gift does not include hands, facial tissue, limbs or other vascularized composite allografts. I understand that if I want to donate a hand, facial tissue, limb or other 20260HB2701PN3772 - 85 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 vascularized composite allograft, there is another place in this document for me to do so. I also understand the hospital may provide artificial support, which may include a ventilator, after I am declared dead in order to facilitate donation. I consent to making a gift of the following parts of my body for transplantation or research (please insert any limitations you desire on donation of specific organs or tissues or eyes or any limitation on the use of a donated part of the body):.................................................................................................................................................................................SIGNATURE..........................DATE....................GIFT OF HANDS, FACIAL TISSUE, LIMBS AND OTHER VASCULARIZED COMPOSITE ALLOGRAFTS........I consent to making a gift of my hands, facial tissue, limbs or other vascularized composite allografts. I also understand that I have the option of requesting reconstruction of my body in preparation for burial and that anonymity of identity may not be able to be protected in the case of donation of hands, facial tissue or limbs. I also understand that burial arrangements may be affected and that an open casket may not be possible. I also understand that the hospital may provide artificial support, which may include a ventilator, after I am declared dead in order to facilitate donation.Please insert any limitations you desire on donation of hands, facial tissue, limbs or other vascularized composite allografts and whether you request reconstructive surgery before burial:20260HB2701PN3772 - 86 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 .................................................................................................................................................................................SIGNATURE..........................DATE............................I do not consent to donating my organs, tissues or any other part of my body, including hands, facial tissue, limbs or other vascularized composite allografts. This provision serves as a refusal to donate any part of my body. This provision also serves as a revocation of any prior decision I have made to donate organs, tissues or other parts of my body, including hands, facial tissue, limbs or other vascularized composite allograft made in a prior document, including a driver's license, will, power of attorney, health care power of attorney or other document.SIGNATURE..........................DATE....................Having carefully read this document, I have signed it this.......day of............., 20..., revoking all previous health care powers of attorney and health care treatment instructions............................................................(SIGN FULL NAME HERE FOR HEALTH CARE POWER OF ATTORNEY AND HEALTH CARE TREATMENT INSTRUCTIONS)WITNESS:.......................WITNESS:.......................Two witnesses at least 18 years of age are required by Pennsylvania law and should witness your signature in each other's presence. A person who signs this document on behalf of and at the direction of a principal may not be a witness. (It is preferable if the witnesses are not your heirs, nor your creditors, nor employed by any of your health care 20260HB2701PN3772 - 87 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 providers.)NOTARIZATION (OPTIONAL)(Notarization of document is not required by Pennsylvania law, but if the document is both witnessed and notarized, it is more likely to be honored by the laws of some other states.)On this..........day of .............., 20...., before me personally appeared the aforesaid declarant and principal, to me known to be the person described in and who executed the foregoing instrument and acknowledged that he/she executed the same as his/her free act and deed.IN WITNESS WHEREOF, I have hereunto set my hand and affixed my official seal in the County of............., State of.............. the day and year first above written............................... .......................... Notary Public My commission expires]Section 10. Title 20 is amended by adding a section to read:§ 5471.1. Example.The following form may be used to create an advance health care directive:ADVANCE HEALTH CARE DIRECTIVEHOW YOU CAN USE THIS FORMYou can use this form if you wish to name someone to make health care decisions for you in case you cannot make decisions for yourself. This is called giving the person a power of attorney for health care. This person is called your Agent.You can also use this form to state your wishes, preferences, and goals for health care, and to say if you want to be an organ donor after you die.YOUR NAME AND DATE OF BIRTH20260HB2701PN3772 - 88 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Name: ......................................................Date of birth: .............................................PART A: NAMING AN AGENTThis part lets you name someone else to make health care decisions for you. You may leave any item blank.1. NAMING AN AGENTI want the following person to make health care decisions for me if I cannot make decisions for myself:Name: ......................................................Optional contact information (it is helpful to include information such as address, phone, and email): ................................................................................2. NAMING AN ALTERNATE AGENTI want the following person to make health care decisions for me if I cannot and my Agent is not able or available to make them for me:Name: .......................................................Optional contact information (it is helpful to include information such as address, phone, and email): ................................................................................3. LIMITING YOUR AGENT'S AUTHORITYI give my Agent the power to make all health care decisions for me if I cannot make those decisions for myself, except the following: .....................................................................................................................(If you do not add a limitation here, your Agent will be able make all health care decisions that an Agent is permitted to make under state law.)PART B: HEALTH CARE INSTRUCTIONSThis part lets you state your priorities for health care and 20260HB2701PN3772 - 89 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 to state types of health care you do and do not want.1. INSTRUCTIONS ABOUT LIFE-SUSTAINING TREATMENTThis section gives you the opportunity to say how you want your Agent to act while making decisions for you. You may mark or initial each choice. You also may leave any choice blank.Treatment. Medical treatment needed to keep me alive but not needed for comfort or any other purpose should (mark or initial all that apply):(____) Always be given to me. (If you mark or initial this choice, you should not mark or initial other choices in this "treatment" section.).(____) Not be given to me if I have a condition that is not curable and is expected to cause my death soon, even if treated.(____) Not be given to me if I am unconscious and I am not expected to be conscious again.(____) Not be given to me if I have a medical condition from which I am not expected to recover that prevents me from communicating with people I care about, caring for myself, and recognizing family and friends.(____) Other (write what you want or do not want): ............................................................................................................................................................................................Food and liquids. If I can't swallow and staying alive requires me to get food or liquids through a tube or other means for the rest of my life, then food or liquids should (mark or initial all that apply):(____) Always be given to me. (If you mark or initial this choice, you should not mark or initial other choices in 20260HB2701PN3772 - 90 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 this "food and liquids" section).(____) Not be given to me if I have a condition that is not curable and is expected to cause me to die soon, even if treated.(____) Not be given to me if I am unconscious and am not expected to be conscious again.(____) Not be given to me if I have a medical condition from which I am not expected to recover that prevents me from communicating with people I care about, caring for myself, and recognizing family and friends.(____) Other (write what you want or do not want): ............................................................................................................................................................................................Pain relief. If I am in significant pain, care that will keep me comfortable but is likely to shorten my life should (mark or initial all that apply):(____) Always be given to me. (If you mark or initial this choice, you should not mark or initial other choices in this "pain relief" section.)(____) Never be given to me. (If you mark or initial this choice, you should not mark or initial other choices in this "pain relief" section.)(____) Be given to me if I have a condition that is not curable and is expected to cause me to die soon, even if treated.(____) Be given to me if I am unconscious and am not expected to be conscious again.(____) Be given to me if I have a medical condition from which I am not expected to recover that prevents me from 20260HB2701PN3772 - 91 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 communicating with people I care about, caring for myself, and recognizing family and friends.(____) Other (write what you want or do not want): ............................................................................................................................................................................................2. MY PRIORITIESYou can use this section to indicate what is important to you, and what is not important to you. This information can help your Agent make decisions for you if you cannot. It also helps others understand your preferences.You may mark or initial each choice. You also may leave any choice blank.Staying alive as long as possible even if I have substantial physical limitations is:(____) Very important(____) Somewhat important(____) Not importantStaying alive as long as possible even if I have substantial mental limitations is:(____) Very important(____) Somewhat important(____) Not importantBeing free from significant pain is:(____) Very important(____) Somewhat important(____) Not importantBeing independent is:(____) Very important(____) Somewhat important20260HB2701PN3772 - 92 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (____) Not importantHaving my Agent talk with my family before making decisions about my care is:(____) Very important(____) Somewhat important(____) Not importantHaving my Agent talk with my friends before making decisions about my care is:(____) Very important(____) Somewhat important(____) Not important3. OTHER INSTRUCTIONSYou can write in this section more information about your goals, values, and preferences for treatment, including care you want or do not want. You can also use this section to name anyone who you do not want to make decisions for you under any conditions.PART C: OPTIONAL SPECIAL POWERS AND GUIDANCEThis part lets you give your Agent additional powers, and to provide more guidance about your wishes. You may mark or initial each choice. You also may leave any choice blank.1. OPTIONAL SPECIAL POWERSMy Agent can do the following things ONLY if I have marked or initialed them below:(____) Admit me as a voluntary patient to a facility for mental health treatment for up to _____ days (write in the number of days you want, up to five days).(If I do not mark or initial this choice, my Agent MAY NOT admit me as a voluntary patient to this type of facility.)20260HB2701PN3772 - 93 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (____) Place me in a long-term care facility for more than 100 days even if my needs can be met somewhere else, I am not terminally ill, and I object.(If I do not mark or initial this choice, my Agent MAY NOT do this.)2. ACCESS TO MY HEALTH INFORMATIONMy Agent may obtain, examine, and share information about my health needs and health care if I am not able to make decisions for myself. If I mark or initial below, my Agent may also do that at any time my Agent thinks it will help me.(____) I give my Agent permission to obtain, examine, and share information about my health needs and health care whenever my Agent thinks it will help me.3. FLEXIBILITY FOR MY AGENTMark or initial below if you want to give your Agent flexibility in following instructions you provide in this form. If you do not, your Agent must follow the instructions even if your Agent thinks something else would be better for you.(____) I give my Agent permission to be flexible in applying these instructions if my Agent thinks it would be in my best interest based on what my Agent knows about me.4. NOMINATION OF GUARDIANYou can say who you would want as your guardian if you needed one. A guardian is a person appointed by a court to make decisions for someone who cannot make decisions. Filling this out does NOT mean you want or need a guardian.If a court appoints a guardian to make personal decisions for me, I want the court to choose:(____) My Agent named in this form. If my Agent cannot be a guardian, I want the Alternate Agent named in this form.20260HB2701PN3772 - 94 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (____) Other (write who you would want and their contact information): .........................................................................................................................................................................PART D: ORGAN DONATIONThis part lets you donate your organs after you die. You may leave any item blank.1. DONATIONYou may mark or initial only one choice.(____) I donate my organs, tissues, and other body parts after I die, even if it requires maintaining treatments that conflict with other instructions I have put in this form, EXCEPT for those I list below (list any body parts you do NOT want to donate): ......................................................................................................................................................................(____) I do not want my organs, tissues, or body parts donated to anybody for any reason. (If you mark or initial this choice, you should skip the "purpose of donation" section.)2. PURPOSE OF DONATIONYou may mark or initial all that apply. (If you do not mark or initial any of the purposes below, your donation can be used for all of them.)Organs, tissues, or body parts that I donate may be used for:(____) Transplant(____) Therapy (____) Research(____) Education(____) All of the above20260HB2701PN3772 - 95 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 PART E: SIGNATURESYOUR SIGNATURESign your name: .............................................Today's date: ...............................................City/Town/Village and State (optional): ..................................................................................SIGNATURE OF A WITNESSYou need a witness if you are using this form to name an Agent. The witness must be an adult and cannot be the person you are naming as Agent or the Agent's spouse or someone the Agent lives with as a couple. If you live or are receiving care in a long-term care facility the witness cannot be an employee or contractor of the facility or someone who owns or runs the facility.Name of Witness: ............................................Signature of Witness: .......................................(Only sign as a witness if you think the person signing above is doing it voluntarily.)Date witness signed: ........................................PART F: INFORMATION FOR AGENTS1. If this form names you as an Agent, you can make decisions about health care for the person who named you when the person cannot make their own.2. If you make a decision for the person, follow any instructions the person gave, including any in this form.3. If you do not know what the person would want, make the decision that you think is in the person's best interest. To figure out what is in the person's best interest, consider the person's values, preferences, and goals if you know them or can learn them. Some of these preferences may be in this form. You 20260HB2701PN3772 - 96 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 should also consider any behavior or communication from the person that indicates what the person currently wants.4. If this form names you as an Agent, you can also get and share the person's health information. But unless the person has said so in this form, you can get or share this information only when the person cannot make decisions about the person's health care for themselves.Section 11. Chapter 58 of Title 20 is repealed:[CHAPTER 58MENTAL HEALTH CARESUBCHAPTER AGENERAL PROVISIONSSec.5801. Applicability.5802. Definitions.5803. Legislative findings and intent.5804. Compliance.5805. Liability.5806. Penalties.5807. Rights and responsibilities.5808. Combining mental health instruments.§ 5801. Applicability.(a) General rule.--This chapter applies to mental health declarations and mental health powers of attorney.(b) Preservation of existing rights.--The provisions of this chapter shall not be construed to impair or supersede any existing rights or responsibilities not addressed in this chapter.§ 5802. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter 20260HB2701PN3772 - 97 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Attending physician." A physician who has primary responsibility for the treatment and care of the declarant or principal."Declarant." An individual who makes a declaration in accordance with this chapter."Declaration." A writing made in accordance with this chapter that expresses a declarant's wishes and instructions for mental health care and mental health care directions and which may contain other specific directions."Mental health care." Any care, treatment, service or procedure to maintain, diagnose, treat or provide for mental health, including any medication program and therapeutical treatment."Mental health care agent." An individual designated by a principal in a mental health power of attorney."Mental health care provider." A person who is licensed, certified or otherwise authorized by the laws of this Commonwealth to administer or provide mental health care in the ordinary course of business or practice of a profession."Mental health power of attorney." A writing made by a principal designating an individual to make mental health care decisions for the principal."Mental health treatment professional." A licensed physician who has successfully completed a residency program in psychiatry or a person trained and licensed in social work, psychology or nursing who has a graduate degree and clinical experience in mental health."Principal." An individual who makes a mental health power 20260HB2701PN3772 - 98 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 of attorney in accordance with this chapter.§ 5803. Legislative findings and intent.(a) Intent.--This chapter provides a means for competent adults to control their mental health care either directly through instructions written in advance or indirectly through a mental health care agent.(b) Presumption not created.--This chapter shall not be construed to create any presumption regarding the intent of an individual who has not executed a declaration or mental health care power of attorney to consent to the use or withholding of treatment.(c) Findings in general.--The General Assembly finds that all capable adults have a qualified right to control decisions relating to their own mental health care.§ 5804. Compliance.(a) Duty to comply.--(1) An attending physician and mental health care provider shall comply with mental health declarations and powers of attorney.(2) If an attending physician or other mental health care provider cannot in good conscience comply with a declaration or mental health care decision of a mental health care agent because the instructions are contrary to accepted clinical practice and medical standards or because treatment is unavailable or if the policies of a mental health care provider preclude compliance with a declaration or mental health care decision of a mental health care agent, immediately upon receipt of the declaration or power of attorney and as soon as any possibility of noncompliance becomes apparent, the attending physician or mental health 20260HB2701PN3772 - 99 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 care provider shall so inform the following:(i) The declarant if the declarant is competent.(ii) The substitute named in the declaration if the declarant is incompetent.(iii) The guardian or other legal representative of the declarant if the declarant is incompetent and a substitute is not named in the declaration.(iv) The mental health care agent of the principal.(3) The physician or mental health care provider shall document the reasons for noncompliance.(b) Transfer.--An attending physician or mental health care provider under subsection (a)(2) shall make every reasonable effort to assist in the transfer of the declarant or principal to another physician or mental health care provider who will comply with the declaration or mental health care decision of the mental health care agent. While the transfer is pending, the patient shall be treated consistent with the declaration or mental health care decision of the mental health agent. If reasonable efforts to transfer fail, the patient may be discharged.§ 5805. Liability.(a) General rule.--A person who is a physician, another mental health care provider or another person who acts in good faith and consistent with this chapter may not be subject to criminal or civil liability, discipline for unprofessional conduct or administrative sanctions and may not be found to have committed an act of unprofessional conduct by any professional board or administrative body with such authority as a result of any of the following:(1) Complying with a direction or decision of an 20260HB2701PN3772 - 100 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 individual who the person believes in good faith has authority to act as a principal's mental health care agent so long as the direction or decision is not clearly contrary to the terms of the mental health power of attorney.(2) Refusing to comply with a direction or decision of an individual based on a good faith belief that the individual lacks authority to act as a principal's mental health care agent.(3) Complying with a mental health care power of attorney or declaration under the assumption that it was valid when made and has not been amended or revoked.(4) Disclosing mental health care information to another person based upon a good faith belief that the disclosure is authorized, permitted or required by this chapter.(5) Refusing to comply with the direction or decision of an individual due to conflicts with a provider's contractual, network or payment policy restrictions.(6) Refusing to comply with a declaration or mental health power of attorney which violates accepted clinical standards or medical standards of care.(7) Making a determination that the patient lacks capacity to make mental health decisions that causes a declaration or a mental health power of attorney to become effective.(8) Failing to determine that a patient lacks capacity to make mental health decisions for the purposes of this chapter.(b) Same effect as if dealing with principal.--Any attending physician, mental health care provider and other person who acts under subsection (a) shall be protected and released to the same 20260HB2701PN3772 - 101 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 extent as if dealing directly with a competent principal.(c) Good faith of mental health care agent.--A mental health care agent who acts according to the terms of a mental health power of attorney may not be subject to civil or criminal liability for acting in good faith for a principal or failing in good faith to act for a principal.§ 5806. Penalties.(a) Offense defined.--A person commits a felony of the third degree by willfully:(1) Concealing, canceling, altering, defacing, obliterating or damaging a declaration without the consent of the declarant.(2) Concealing, canceling, altering, defacing, obliterating or damaging a mental health power of attorney or any amendment or revocation thereof without the consent of the principal.(3) Causing a person to execute a declaration or power of attorney under this chapter by undue influence, fraud or duress.(4) Falsifying or forging a mental health power of attorney or declaration or any amendment or revocation thereof, the result of which is a direct change in the mental health care provided to the principal.(b) Removal and liability.--An agent who willfully fails to comply with a mental health power of attorney may be removed and sued for actual damages.§ 5807. Rights and responsibilities.(a) Declarants and principals.--Persons who execute a declaration or a mental health power of attorney shall have the following rights and responsibilities:20260HB2701PN3772 - 102 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) For the purposes of this chapter, persons are presumed capable of making mental health decisions, including the execution of a mental health declaration or power of attorney, unless they are adjudicated incapacitated, involuntarily committed or found to be incapable of making mental health decisions after examination by a psychiatrist and one of the following: another psychiatrist, psychologist, family physician, attending physician or mental health treatment professional. Whenever possible, at least one of the decision makers shall be a treating professional of the declarant or principal.(2) Persons shall be required to notify their mental health care provider of the existence of any declaration or mental health power of attorney.(3) Persons shall execute or amend their declarations or mental health powers of attorney every two years; however, if a person is incapable of making mental heath care decisions at the time this document would expire, the document shall remain in effect and be reviewed at the time when the person regains capacity.(4) Persons shall give notice of amendment and revocation to providers, agents and guardians, if any.(b) Providers.--Mental health treatment providers shall have the following rights and responsibilities:(1) Inquire as to the existence of declarations or powers of attorney for persons in their care.(2) Inform persons who are being discharged from treatment about the availability of mental health declarations and powers of attorney as part of discharge planning.20260HB2701PN3772 - 103 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) Not require declarations or powers of attorney as conditions of treatment. Mental health treatment providers may not choose whether to accept a person for treatment based solely on the existence or absence of a mental health declaration or power of attorney.§ 5808. Combining mental health instruments.(a) General rule.--A declaration and mental health power of attorney may be combined into one mental health document.(b) Form.--A combined declaration and mental health power of attorney may be in the following form or any other written form which contains the information required under Subchapters B (relating to mental health declarations) and C (relating to mental health powers of attorney):Combined Mental Health Care Declarationand Power of Attorney FormPart I. Introduction.I, , having capacity to make mental health decisions, willfully and voluntarily make this declaration and power of attorney regarding my mental health care.I understand that mental health care includes any care, treatment, service or procedure to maintain, diagnose, treat or provide for mental health, including any medication program and therapeutic treatment. Electroconvulsive therapy may be administered only if I have specifically consented to it in this document. I will be the subject of laboratory trials or research only if specifically provided for in this document. Mental health care does not include psychosurgery or termination of parental rights.I understand that my incapacity will be determined by examination by a psychiatrist and one of the following: 20260HB2701PN3772 - 104 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 another psychiatrist, psychologist, family physician, attending physician or mental health treatment professional. Whenever possible, one of the decision makers will be one of my treating professionals.Part II. Mental Health Declaration.A. When this declaration becomes effective.This declaration becomes effective at the following designated time:( ) When I am deemed incapable of making mental health care decisions.( ) When the following condition is met:(List condition)B. Treatment preferences.1. Choice of treatment facility.( ) In the event that I require commitment to a psychiatric treatment facility, I would prefer to be admitted to the following facility:(Insert name and address of facility)( ) In the event that I require commitment to a psychiatric treatment facility, I do not wish to be committed to the following facility:(Insert name and address of facility)I understand that my physician may have to place me in a facility that is not my preference.2. Preferences regarding medications for psychiatric treatment.( ) I consent to the medications that my treating physician recommends.( ) I consent to the medications that my treating physician recommends with the following exception, preference or 20260HB2701PN3772 - 105 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 limitation:(List medication and reason for exception, preference or limitation)The exception, preference or limitation applies to generic, brand name and trade name equivalents. I understand that dosage instructions are not binding on my physician.( ) I do not consent to the use of any medications.( ) I have designated an agent under the power of attorney portion of this document to make decisions related to medication.3. Preferences regarding electroconvulsive therapy (ECT).( ) I consent to the administration of electroconvulsive therapy.( ) I do not consent to the administration of electroconvulsive therapy.( ) I have designated an agent under the power of attorney portion of this document to make decisions related to electroconvulsive therapy.4. Preferences for experimental studies or drug trials.( ) I consent to participation in experimental studies if my treating physician believes that the potential benefits to me outweigh the possible risks to me.( ) I have designated an agent under the power of attorney portion of this document to make decisions related to experimental studies.( ) I do not consent to participation in experimental studies.( ) I consent to participation in drug trials if my treating physician believes that the potential benefits to me outweigh 20260HB2701PN3772 - 106 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the possible risks to me.( ) I have designated an agent under the power of attorney portion of this document to make decisions related to drug trials.( ) I do not consent to participation in any drug trials.5. Additional instructions or information.Examples of other instructions or information that may be included:Activities that help or worsen symptoms.Type of intervention preferred in the event of a crisis.Mental and physical health history.Dietary requirements.Religious preferences.Temporary custody of children.Family notification.Limitations on the release or disclosure of mental healthrecords.Other matters of importance.C. Revocation.This declaration may be revoked in whole or in part at any time, either orally or in writing, as long as I have not been found to be incapable of making mental health decisions.My revocation will be effective upon communication to my attending physician or other mental health care provider, either by me or a witness to my revocation, of the intent to revoke. If I choose to revoke a particular instruction contained in this declaration in the manner specified, I understand that the other instructions contained in this declaration will remain effective until:(1) I revoke this declaration in its entirety;20260HB2701PN3772 - 107 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) I make a new combined mental health declaration and power of attorney; or(3) two years after the date this document was executed.D. Termination.I understand that this declaration will automatically terminate two years from the date of execution unless I am deemed incapable of making mental health care decisions at the time that this declaration would expire.(Specify date)E. Preference as to a court-appointed guardian.I understand that I may nominate a guardian of my person for consideration by the court if incapacity proceedings are commenced under 20 Pa.C.S. § 5511. I understand that the court will appoint a guardian in accordance with my most recent nomination except for good cause or disqualification. In the event a court decides to appoint a guardian, I desire the following person to be appointed:(Insert name, address, telephone number of the designatedperson)( ) The appointment of a guardian of my person will not give the guardian the power to revoke, suspend or terminate this declaration.( ) Upon appointment of a guardian, I authorize the guardian to revoke, suspend or terminate this declaration.Part III. Mental Health Power of Attorney.I, , having the capacity to make mental health decisions, authorize my designated health care agent to make certain decisions on my behalf regarding my mental health care. If I have not expressed a choice in this document or in the accompanying declaration, I authorize my agent to make 20260HB2701PN3772 - 108 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the decision that my agent determines is the decision I would make if I were competent to do so.A. Designation of agent.I hereby designate and appoint the following person as my agent to make mental health care decisions for me as authorized in this document. This authorization applies only to mental health decisions that are not addressed in the accompanying signed declaration.(Insert name of designated person)Signed:(My name, address, telephone number)Witnesses' signatures:(Insert names, addresses, telephone numbers of witnesses)Agent's acceptance:I hereby accept designation as mental health care agent for(Insert name of declarant)Agent's signature:(Insert name, address, telephone number of designated person)B. Designation of alternative agent.In the event that my first agent is unavailable or unable to serve as my mental health care agent, I hereby designate and appoint the following individual as my alternative mental health care agent to make mental health care decisions for me as authorized in this document:(Insert name of designated person)Signed:(My name, address, telephone number)Witnesses' signatures:(Insert names, addresses, telephone numbers of witnesses)Alternative agent's acceptance:20260HB2701PN3772 - 109 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 I hereby accept designation as alternative mental health care agent for (Insert name of declarant)Alternative agent's signature:(Insert name, address, telephone number of alternative agent)C. When this power of attorney become effective.This power of attorney will become effective at the following designated time:( ) When I am deemed incapable of making mental health care decisions.( ) When the following condition is met:(List condition)D. Authority granted to my mental health care agent.I hereby grant to my agent full power and authority to make mental health care decisions for me consistent with the instructions and limitations set forth in this document. If I have not expressed a choice in this power of attorney or in the accompanying declaration, I authorize my agent to make the decision that my agent determines is the decision I would make if I were competent to do so.(1) Preferences regarding medications for psychiatric treatment.( ) My agent is authorized to consent to the use of any medications after consultation with my treating psychiatrist and any other persons my agent considers appropriate.( ) My agent is not authorized to consent to the use of any medications.(2) Preferences regarding electroconvulsive therapy (ECT).( ) My agent is authorized to consent to the administration of electroconvulsive therapy.20260HB2701PN3772 - 110 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 ( ) My agent is not authorized to consent to the administration of electroconvulsive therapy.(3) Preferences for experimental studies or drug trials.( ) My agent is authorized to consent to my participation in experimental studies if, after consultation with my treating physician and any other individuals my agent deems appropriate, my agent believes that the potential benefits to me outweigh the possible risks to me.( ) My agent is not authorized to consent to my participation in experimental studies.( ) My agent is authorized to consent to my participation in drug trials if, after consultation with my treating physician and any other individuals my agent deems appropriate, my agent believes that the potential benefits to me outweigh the possible risks to me.( ) My agent is not authorized to consent to my participation in drug trials.E. Revocation.This power of attorney may be revoked in whole or in part at any time, either orally or in writing, as long as I have not been found to be incapable of making mental health decisions.My revocation will be effective upon communication to my attending physician or other mental health care provider, either by me or a witness to my revocation, of the intent to revoke. If I choose to revoke a particular instruction contained in this power of attorney in the manner specified, I understand that the other instructions contained in this power of attorney will remain effective until:(1) I revoke this power of attorney in its entirety;(2) I make a new combined mental health care declaration 20260HB2701PN3772 - 111 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 and power of attorney; or(3) two years from the date this document was executed. I understand that this power of attorney will automatically terminate two years from the date of execution unless I am deemed incapable of making mental health care decisions at the time that the power of attorney would expire.I am making this combined mental health care declaration and power of attorney on the (insert day) day of (insert month), (insert year).My signature:(My name, address, telephone number)Witnesses' signatures:(Names, addresses, telephone numbers of witnesses).If the principal making this combined mental health care declaration and power of attorney is unable to sign this document, another individual may sign on behalf of and at the direction of the principal.Signature of person signing on my behalf:(Name, address, telephone number)]Section 12. This act shall take effect in 180 days.20260HB2701PN3772 - 112 - 1234567891011121314151617181920